Museums - Draft Heritage Study and Environmental Assessment Library __________________________________________________________________ NAME STATE LOCATION DESCRIPTION OWNERSHIP STORIES OF THE DELTA RELATION TO OTHER LMDR SITES VISITOR USE COMMENTS 1 Old Landmark Inn 
Private Architecture; The River William 
This restaurant overlooking the Mississippi River is about all that is left from Chester's riverboat heydey.
Delta Queen, other riverboats dock sometimes.
Mark Twain is said to have frequented here.
2 William 
Originally built in 1855, building sits on a high bluff overlooking the Mississippi River.
Inside, fireplaces and woodwork reflect earlier era.
Public Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values Old Landmark Inn 
3 Roscoe Misselhorn Art Gallery Illinois Randolph County, Sparta Housed in the restored GM 
Public Art; History Randolph County Archives Building, ASC Provincial House (Ruma Convent) [sites Misselhorn sketched] Weekend hours: 1 p.m. to 5 p.m., but private tours can be arranged.
Sketches spanning 1920s to present are of the surrounding area, as well as St. Louis, Chicago, and other places.
Residents call Misselhorn their local "Norman Rockwell."
4 Popeye Museum/Spinach Can Collectibles Illinois Randolph County, Chester Gift store selling Popeye memorabilia housed in the Old Opera House where Elzie Segar, Popeye's Creator, once worked.
Private Expressing Cultural Values NA Museum of Popeye memorabilia with items to sell.
Elzie Segar, a native of Chester, created his "Popeye", comic strip using local people.
5 Popeye Mural on the side of the Old Chester Opera House Illinois Randolph County, Chester Mural on the side of the Old Chester Opera House, where Elzie Segar worked.
Includes Olive Oyl, Popeye, and Wimpy; gives names of local people on which the characters are based.
Public Expressing Cultural Values Segar's birthplace; marked grave of Rocky Feigle [basis for Popeye].
Good for Popeye fans, can be viewed easily.
Universal planning to open a Popeye theme park.
Popeye has his own stamp.
6 Marked grave of Frank "Rocky" Feigle, basis for Popeye.
Illinois Randolph County, Chester Frank "Rocky" Feigle's grave, in St. Mary's Cemetery, now has a tombstone with a picture of Popeye on it.
Grave was marked by the Popeye Fan Club Expressing Cultural Values NA Easily viewed Rocky Feigle was sort of the town bully; always had a pipe in his mouth.
7 Riverboat Mural at U.S. Post Office Illinois Randolph County, Chester, IL Built in June 1938, occupied in May 1939, site still in use today.
Real interest is 1930s wall mural, painted around 1940 by Fay Davis, a Depression artist.
Shows Chester's riverboat era.
Public The River; Architecture; Art; Women Old Landmark Inn and Captain's Table Restaurant Open regular business hours.
Mural is described as a "Hollywood-type depiction" akin to Showboat.
Other Fay Davis work is said to be in other areas of Illinois.
8 Sparta Community Airport/"Hunter Field" Illinois Randolph County, Sparta Organized in 1959.
Called "Hunter Field" after the Hunter brothers, local aviation pioneers.
Pictures of Hunter brothers with their aircraft and other memorabilia hang in the office, and a plaque is mounted on a post.
Public Aviation NA No admission.
Pavilion and picnic area for public.
Hunter brothers, friends of C. Lindbergh, set aviation records, most notably world endurance record for flying over Chicago nonstop for 28 days in 1929.
Two died tragically, one air-related; 2 others flew, private pilot for a congressman, other for AA. 9 John A. Logan Museum Illinois Jackson County, Murphysboro Located at site of Logan's birth, museum honors Logan, who fought in the Mexican War in 1846 and served as a Union soldier, rising to major general.
Public Civil War; Veterans Other Civil War sites Regular hours on weekends Logan fought in Battle of Bull Run, kept Union forces from destroying Raleigh after Lincoln's death.
Elected to Congress after Mexican and Civil Wars.
Launched Memorial Day; swayed Southern Illinois to Union side.
VP mate, J. Blaine in 1884 Pres. race.
10 ASC Provincial House (The Ruma Convent) Illinois Randolph County, Ruma In a building built before 1860s, Clara Zerr 
(see "Comments") Private Religion; Ethnic Diversity; Architecture; Agriculture Other religious communities Private property includes a nursing home; visitors asked not to walk the grounds unsupervised.
Can call to arrange tours.
Former school and seminary turned over to the sisters.
Building additions made in 1870, 1890, 1925.
Farm produces corn, wheat, cattle; sisters teach and are missionaries.
Now 500 acres and serve world community.
Province headquarters.
11 National Coal Museum Illinois Franklin County, near West Frankfort Established 132 years ago, only mine shaft open to the public.
Located 600 feet belowground.
Visitors enter a cage and drop down.
View is pre-dinosaur, over 300 million years old.
Public nonprofit Working People; Building the American Economy Other coal mines Open 7 days a week, tour guides are actual coal miners who worked in mine in '94 before closing.
Admission fee; groups of 20 or more need reservation.
Interpreters available with advance notice.
Mine opened August 1996; has drawn over 4,000 visitors.
Dream of Charles Ledvina, former coal miner paralyzed in mine accident.
Dedicated to pre-serving rich coal mine heritage.
Plans are to open restored 1920s Hoist House, building leads to the cage leading to mine.
More memorabilia will be added, too.
12 Randolph County Museum and Archives Illinois Randolph County, Chester, IL Stone Gothic building constructed in 1864 now houses museum and archives of French Colonial Records.
Public Architecture; Ethnic Diversity Roscoe Misselhorn Gallery (sketching of building) Part-time curator, but can view building during regular business hours.
NA 13 Ibendahl Farmstead Illinois Perry County, near DuQuoin This 12-room house built in 1850s contains Locust Hill Academy, Illinois's first graded school system (attended by John Logan).
Started in 1858 by B. G. Roots, who also hid slaves during Civil War.
Private Education; Ethnic Diversity; Slavery; Civil War John A. Logan Museum Tours by appointment only.
The Ibendahls are knowledgeable about the history.
NA 14 Harvey Pitt's Waterfowl Museum Illinois Perry County, DuQuoin Display of 550 antique wood duck decoys; also mounted waterfowl Private People versus Nature NA Tours by appointment only; entrance fee $1, refreshments provided.
Harvey Pitt is well-spoken and knowledgeable.
He has expanded his home to accommodate this museum.
15 Marion Cultural Center Illinois Williamson County, Marion, IL Restored 1921 vaudeville theater Public Expressing Cultural Values: theater arts.
NA Plays and performances offered throughout the year.
Harry Houdini performed here.
16 Egyptian Drive-In Restaurant Illinois Williamson County Drive-in movie theater; world's largest screen at 12 stories high.
Private Recreation; Expressing Cultural Values NA Eat-in restaurant.
Movies shown from February to October.
One of Illinois's remaining drive-in movie theaters; old-fashioned prices.
17 Depot Veterans' Museum/Coal Miners' Memorial Illinois Franklin County, West Frankfort Restored railroad depot housing a museum of memorabilia of all 1900s wars Public War; Working People; Building the American Economy National Coal Museum Tours available by appointment NA 18 Frankfort Area Museum Illinois Franklin County, West Frankfort Built in 1916; contains exhibits spanning 1802-1976, including early home, early doctor's office.
Public Peopling Places; Working People, National Coal Museum; Depot Veterans' Museum/Coal Miners' Memorial Open Wednesdays and Thursdays Has a widely used genealogy library; also has noose used to hang Charlie Birger of the Shelton Gang in the 1920s.
19 The Hill House (Bed 
Contains original picture rail.
Private Vernacular Architecture NA Four rooms available for visitors, each with a different theme, one of which is Lincoln-Douglass, another, antiques.
NA 20 Bald Knob Cross Illinois Union County Cross, 111 ft. tall, was completed in 1963 as a national symbol of faith in God.
When lit at night, can be seen over 7,500 square miles.
Public Spirituality NA Bald Knob Recreation Area is available at no charge to all religious groups.
Welcome center on premise offers refreshments.
First Easter service was held here in 1937; wooden cross built in 1938.
Three wooden crosses still there were erected in 1945.
Founders Wayman Presley and Rev. William Lirely died in 1990 and 1992, respectively.
21 The Superman Museum Illinois Massac County, Metropolis Museum housing more than 40,000 items relating to Superman, including comic books, movie props, original art, a phone booth.
Private Popular Culture Superman statue Open 7 days a week 9 a.m.-6 p.m.; $3 general admission, children 5 
NA 22 Superman Statue Illinois Massac County, Metropolis Fifteen-foot statue with "Truth, Justice, and The American Way" carved on its base.
Public Popular Culture The Superman Museum NA Only U.S. town named Metropolis, so town raised more than $100,000 to build statue by selling bricks where the statue stands.
The local newspaper even renamed itself The Metropolis Planet.
23 The Chocolate Factory Illinois Pope County, Dixon Springs Chocolate shop featuring over 30 different kinds of chocolate, plus a variety of beverages and ice cream Private Expressing Cultural Values: food NA Restaurant Across the street from Dixon Springs State Park.
24 Colvis Orchards Illinois Randolph County, north of Chester Orchards that have been in Colvis family for four generations.
Private Peopling Places; Food NA Closed Christmas to mid-April.
Sells bedding plants, chrysanthemums, holiday plants, dried flowers, candies, crafts, etc.
Harry Colvis moved to this site in 1908 to escape the flood.
Fourth generation now operates the orchards.
25 Elzie Segar's Birthplace (Creator of Popeye) Illinois Randolph County, Chester Marker indicating where Elzie Segar was born.
Public/Private Popular Culture; Recreation Popeye Statue; Spinach Can Murals; Popeye Museum; Rocky Feigle's grave Marker only; house is privately occupied.
Segar created the comic strip in 1929, basing characters on many town residents, including his boss for Wimpy.
Popeye will have a theme park at Disney World.
He already has a stamp.
26 Popeye Statue Illinois Randolph County, Chester Statue of Popeye commissioned by the city because Popeye creator Elzie Segar is a Chester native.
Public Popular Culture Elzie Segar's Birthplace; Popeye Mural; Spinach Can Collectibles; Popeye Museum NA NA 27 Old Slave House Illinois Gallatin County, Equality Three-story mansion built between 1834 and 1838.
Slaves were kept on the third floor, and there was a breeding room to breed new slaves.
Private Slavery; Race Relations Other slavery-related sites Not open to public at present.
Owner John Hart Crenshaw built this house where he kept slaves he bought and traded on the third floor, where he also had two slave posts for whipping slaves.
There is much in the house.
Hopefully someone will ensure that it reopens.
28 The American Fluorite Museum Illinois Hardin County, Rosiclare Museum dedicated to fluorspar, or fluorite, state's official mineral.
On the site of an actual mine last worked in 1954.
Mineral appears as crystals.
Used in making steel, aerosols, ceramic glaze.
Public Building the American Economy Other labor/industry sites Plans to start hours for visiting.
Originally lead was mined, but owners discovered Fluorspar could be used with steel; began mining it after Civil War.
Fluorspar appears as crystals in hues from purple to green, pink, yellow, and amethyst.
29 Veterans' Affairs Hospital Illinois Williamson County, Marion Hospital built in 1941 has an Egyptian motif and is painted in different hues of pink, with terra cotta running throughout.
In addition, there are some eagles on top of the building.
Public Architecture; War Egyptian Drive-in Restaurant Can drive by and see unusual architecture Egyptian theme is compatible with Cairo in Alexander, and the area known as "little Egypt."
30 Concord Cemetery Illinois Pulaski Co., Concord Cemetery, 3 miles northwest of Olmstead, IL Small cemetery of 3 acres which has been there since before the Civil War, estimates range around 1828 to 1836.
Grave of Ed Gore particular note.
Notorious practical joker, had a tombstone built prior to death that kind of looks like a pyramid.
Private Regional Creativity NA Can Visit Anytime The pyramid-like tombstone has a 10 ft. square base and goes about 40 feet up and has a cannonball atop it.
Built in 1933, just a little before Ed Gore died.
31 Concord cemetery Illinois Pulaski County, near Olmstead Small 3-acre cemetery has existed since before the Civil War, estimates range around 1828 to 1836.
Of particular note, grave of Ed Gore, a notorious practical joker who had a rather pyramid-looking tombstone built before his death.
Private Regional Creativity NA Can visit anytime Gore's pyramid-shaped tombstone has a base 10 feet square and is about 40 feet tall, with a cannonball atop it.
Built in 1933, just a little before Ed Gore died.
32 Hamilton County Historical Society Museum Illinois Hamilton County, second floor of McCoy Memorial Library, McLeansboro Housed in a Victorian house built around 1884.
War room in the museum includes war memorabilia from Mexican War to the Vietnam war.
Also has a genealogy room.
Public Regional History; Military History Other military and war-related sites Open 1 p.m. to 4 p.m. Mondays, Wednesdays, and Fridays This Victorian house is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.
33 Matsel Cabin Illinois White County, Carmi Log cabin built in 1850s - 1860s that portrays mid-1800s life of an average family.
Public Peopling Places Other "Peopling Places" sites Carmi Chamber of Commerce has information This may be only site in Carmi not on the National Register of Historic Places.
Perhaps it is a candidate as well.
34 Mary Lou's Illinois Jackson County, Carbondale Restaurant started in the 1960s; slogan is "Downtown, down home."
Private Expressing Cultural Values: food Other restaurants Known for biscuits and gravy, homemade cream pies.
Everything is homemade in this "downtown, down home" restaurant that is a tradition at Southern Illinois University.
Has pictures on the wall.
35 Saline County Area Museum Illinois Saline County, Harrisburg Eleven buildings on property, which was originally a poplar farm from 1855 to 1948.
Converted to museum in 1960.
Contains a 22-room house that has a south wing of 10 rooms built in 1855, and a north wing with 12 rooms, in 1877.
Never used residentially.
Public Peopling Places; Architecture; Building the American Economy; Religion Other "Peopling Places" sites Open 9 a.m. to 4 p.m. Tuesdays-Saturdays; Sundays 12-4 p.m., closed Mondays Of 170 original acres, 3.5 remain.
Cemetery across street is still in use.
Buildings on property brought in from around county: one-room schoolhouse from 1800s, small grocery store, post office, log cabin, church, caretaker's cabin over 170 years old.
36 The Paul Powell Museum Illinois Johnson County, Vienna Museum opened in 1979 at birth home of Paul Powell, the 31st and 32nd Illinois secretary of state.
Served in state government beginning in 1934; died in office.
Public Regional History NA Saturdays and Sundays 2 to 4 p.m. Paul Powell was one of the key sponsors for McCormick Place in Chicago.
He helped Harry Truman win Illinois in 1948 and John F. Kennedy in 1960.
37 Cobden Museum Illinois Union County, Cobden Museum opened in 1961 with an emphasis on Indian artifacts in the Southern Illinois area, but now it also has Civil War items, a pump organ, and Anna Kirkpatrick pottery.
Private Native Americans; Regional History; War Other Native American sites Closed in winter; reopens each April; can call owners for hours.
Indian artifacts include projectile points, tools, pottery, weapons, hunting tools and jewelry.
Believed to be one of the largest public displays of Indian artifacts in southern Illinois.
38 Lincoln-Douglass Debate Marker Illinois Union County, Jonesboro, Large piece of stone with a brass plate describing the historic debate marks the site of the 1858 debate.
Public Civil War; American History Other Civil War sites Site and Lincoln Memorial Picnic Area open every day from 8 a.m. to 10 p.m. NA 39 Williamson County Museum Illinois Williamson County, Marion Museum occupies the old Williamson County Jail, built in 1913.
Public Regional History NA Closed December 1 through April 1; open April-December on Thursdays from 9 a.m. to 3 p.m. Sixteen sheriffs and families lived in this building while inmates were incarcerated in back.
Now it houses information about Williamson County.
40 Davie Intermediate Grade School Illinois Union County, Anna School building 100 years old.
Donated by Davie, who asked that town be named after his wife, Anna.
Public Architecture Other schools Visitor services not established yet Building has always been used as a school; what the town will do with it is unknown.
41 Old Railroad Bridge Illinois Alexander County, Thebes Old bridge made of double-tracked steel Channel span is 671 feet long.
Public? Railroads; Architecture NA Not yet determined Bridge designed by Ralph Mojeski, son of famous opera singer, crosses Mississippi River to Scott City, MO. Tested on May 25, 1905.
42 Garden of the Gods Illinois Gallatin County, Elizabethtown Collection of wind- and water-eroded limestone and sandstone cliffs.
The land, once flat, has lifted up thousands of feet over hundreds of centuries.
Public People versus Nature NA NA NA 43 Battlefield-Belmont, MO Missouri Mississippi County near East Prairie Civil War Battlefield: Nov 7, 1861, U.S. Grant's first Civil War engagement.
Attacked town of Belmont from Mississippi River, forcing the Confeder-ates to retreat after 4 hours of fighting.
Overconfident, the Federals set no defenses and were driven back.
Private Civil War Other Civil War sites None None 44 Margaret Harwell Art Museum Missouri Poplar Bluff, MO Fine Arts Museum in an 1833 home houses a growing collection of works by contempo-rary Missouri artists.
Private Recreation Museum None 45 New Madrid Historical Museum Missouri New Madrid, MO Exhibits on New Madrid earthquake, Civil War, Native Americans, and turn-of-the-century items Public The River/Civil War Island No. 10, Belmont Battlefield, Burnt Mill Museum Also an observation deck overlooking the Mississippi River 46 Altenburg, MO Missouri Perry County, Altenburg, MO Founded in 1839 by the congregation of Trinity Lutheran Church.
First MO town established for purely religious purposes.
Varies-see individual sites See individual sites See individual sites See individual sites Of seven closely grouped Saxon Lutheran settle-ments, only Alten-burg, Frohna, and Uniontown remain; Dresden, Seelitz, Johannisberg, and Wittenberg declined.
47 Darnstaedt House Missouri Perry County, Altenburg One-room log cabin built c. 1839 Private Vernacular architecture Other Altenburg sites None In 1840, house accommodated Johann Darnstaedt, wife, and four children.
48 Old Trinity Lutheran Church Missouri Altenburg, Perry County One-story structure, c. 1845.
Vernacular construction, built with various sizes of limestone.
Converted in 1867 to a school; closed in 1969.
Private Spirituality Other Altenburg sites Building is now a museum displaying local church items, including an 1845 baptismal tray and the original church bell, cast in Spain, 1761.
None 49 Log Cabin College Altenburg, Perry County One-story structure c. 1839.
First Lutheran seminary west of Missis-sippi River; moved here in 1912 from Dresden.
From this evolved Concordia Seminary, oldest Lutheran institiution of higher learning in MO.
Public Spirituality Other Altenburg sites College has been semi-converted into a museum with exhibits None 50 Trinity Lutheran Church Missouri Altenburg, Perry Co.
Large church, c. 1866 Private Spirituality Other Altenburg sites Open to the public.
Built from locally quarried sandstone 51 St. Laurence Catholic Church Missouri Scott County, MO, near New Hamburg Built c. 1857 by Belgian immigrants.
Built with locally quarried stone.
Church burned during the Civil War; only a shell of a church (just walls) remain.
Private Civil War Belmont Battlefield, Burnt Mill, Island No. 10 No visitation No comment 52 Iron County Courthouse Missouri Iron County, MO, Ironton Iron County's first and only courthouse (enlarged in 1964.)
Two-story red brick structure with Italianate influences.
During Civil War, each side occupied the courthouse twice.
Bullet scars still visible.
Public Civil War Belmont Battlefield, Burnt Mill Visitors may stroll grounds, though not much of the interior is open to public.
Courthouse is still in use.
Also on grounds, an 1898 gazebo 53 Shot Tower Site Missouri Jefferson County, Herculaneum, MO Bronze plaque Public Working People/Conflict between people and nature Iron furnaces Downtown displays some good examples of late 19th century architecture.
Town named for the Roman town buried by Mount Vesuvius.
Town founder Moses Austin likened the smoke from the lead mines to that of Vesuvius.
Town is evidence of Missouri's mining heritage.
Towers built c.1819.
54 Sandy Creek Covered Bridge Missouri Jefferson County, Goldman Built in 1872 to span Sandy Creek.
Destroy-ed in 1886 flood; rebuilt to same specifications.
Public Conflict between people and nature Shot Tower site, Iron Furnace None Bridge was one of six covered bridges along the Hillsboro-Lemay Ferry Rd through the mining areas to St. Loius.
Testament to the importance of mining in the area.
55 Doolittle, MO Missouri Phelps County Small town established in 1944, named for WW II General Jimmy Dooittle.
On farmland along old Route 66.
Sights along Route 66 in andnear Doolittle: Aaron's Radiator, Malone's Service Station, Eisenhower Street.
Private Recreation Rolla Cemetery None Appearance has not changed a great deal; this section of Route 66 is rather well preserved.
Tours might be profitable, at least a brochure to illustrate the immense cultural impact of Route 66.
56 Topaz Mill Missouri Douglas County Built c.1893, Topaz Mill is reportedly the area's oldest mill.
Built on the North fork of the White River by a Choctaw woman and her husband.
Private Native Americans; Conflict between People and Nature Shot Tower site, Cowan Cemetery Maps are available at Mountain Grove Chamber of Commerce Mill is in an idyllic setting, seems to be begging for restoration and a visitor center.
There are other mills in the area.
57 Potosi, MO Missouri Washington County Population 2,683.
In 1797 Moses Austin (father of Stephen F. Austin) acquired a mine and 3 square miles of land as a Spanish grant.
The mine became a successful year-round operation.
It included a shot tower, a lead processing plant, mills, and stores.
Public/Private See individual sites See individual sites Chamber of Commerce provides map and history of town.
Sites: Creswell Furnace Chimney, Washington County Jail, Folk art cemetery, Museum/Moses Austin's grave 58 Creswell Furnace Chimney Missouri Washington County, Potosi Stone ruins, built c. 1838; only chimney remains.
There was Scotch hearth here that had a daily output of two and a half tons of pig lead.
Private People vs. Nature; American Economy Shot Tower site, Iron furnace None None 59 Folk Art Cemetery Missouri Washington County, near Potosi Behind a wood fence in this cemetery lies the grave of Daley Nicholas, owner of Nicholas Farms.
Monument includes two life-size plastic bulls and a carved headstone depicting a bull, a trailer, and a truck.
Private Expressing Cultural Values Cowan cemetery None None 60 Museum/Moses Austin's grave Missouri Washington County, Potosi Built c. 1833.
Washington County historical museum, formerly a Presbyterian Church (congregation disbanded 1908).
Houses local items pertaining to local culture: medicine, music, education, mining, etc.
Austin's grave liesin the adjacent cemetery.
Public Working People; Expressing Cultural Values; People versus Nature Shot tower site, Cowan cemetery, other Potosi sites None None 61 Washington County jail Missouri Wahington County, Potosi Two-story brick jail with stone foundation and iron bars, built in 1892.
Public Peopling Places Other Potosi sites None Not much development available; this is still a working jail; however, it is an interesting stop for a walking tour of Potosi.
Not many jails this old are still in operation.
62 Downtown Marble Hill Missouri Bollinger County Numerous buildings from late 19th and early 20th centuries: Wisecarver bldg (two-story brick, 1893, across from courthouse); Conrad House (two-story granite, c. 1900); Will Mayfield College (1884-1930, several campus buildings remain, Mayfield Dr.) Public/Private Working people Log Cabin College Chamber of Commerce has brochures on town histories and buildings.
The number of well-preserved buildings gives visitors a sense of a typical small Missouri town from the turn of the century.
63 Cowan Cemetery Missouri Wayne County Rural cemetery that features a tall, carved 1870 shaft, which marks the mass grave of seven Confederate soldiers shot by Federal forces on May 28, 1865.
Testament to the fierce sectional conflict.
Private Native Americans; Civil War Burnt Mill, Belmont Battlefield Cemetery is fairly isolated.
Land was originally settled by Native Americans, then by the R.D. Cowan family.
Brochures seem a viable option; should be available in town.
64 Island No. 10 Missouri Scott County, New Madrid No longer exists; island 2 miles long, 0.5 miles wide blocked all river traffic during Civil War, was heavily protected by a floating battery of guns.
Federal Gen. Pope was ordered to attack island.
(more under "comments") Civil War Cowan Cemetery, Belmont Battlefield New Madrid Museum but first New Madrid had to be captured.
'With 20,000 men, Pope took the town and island by cutting a 12- mile channel west from the Mississippi River to bayous, emptying into a river near New Madrid.
On April 18, 1862, the Confederates surrendered.
65 Catholic Cemetery Missouri Washington County, near Sullivan Local lore claims that Toussaint Charbonneau is buried here.
Charbon-neau was the famous trapper, husband of Sacajawea, who served as guide and interpreter for the Lewis and Clark expedition.
Private Native Americans; Expressing Cultural Values Cowan Cemetery None.
Marker needed; the Lewis and Clark expedition began in Missouri.
Charbonneau was the husband of Sacajawea, a Shoshoni Indian who mediated between explorers and Indians during the expedition.
She is honored by more monuments than any other Native American woman.
66 Murphey's Furnace Chimney Missouri Washington County, near Washington State Park Pyramid-shaped rock chimney 40 feet tall marks the location of a lead smelting furnace built c. 1848 by Irish immigrants.
Public Conflict between people and nature; American Economy; Cultural Diversity: Irish settlers Shot Tower site, Iron furnace None; perhaps worth a brochure Chimney is a testament ot the importance of mining in the area, as well as the varied ethnic groups that settled here.
67 Old Mines Missouri Washington County Early lead diggings were conducted at this site by Creoles c. 1726.
Village of Old Mines established c. 1802.
Never incorporated, the town today is located in the original minig concession, a narrow strip of land paralleling SR 21 and Old Mines Creek.
Public/Private Cultural Diversity: Creole settlers Murphey's Furnace Chimney, Catholic cemetery, St. Joachim Catholic Church None As recently as 1941, Creole customs and languauge were still evident.
Supposedly these were some of Missouri's first mines.
68 St. Joachim Catholic Church Missouri Washington County, just west of Old Mines Brick church with windows and doors in a cruciform design, built c. 1828; restored in 1945.
Original belfry, spire and stained glass windows.
Adjacent cemetery has headstones with French inscriptions.
Spirituality; Cultural Diversity: Creole settlers; Expressing Cultural Values Odd Fellow cemetery, St. Mary of the Barrens, Murphey's Furnace Chimney None Cemetery had divided sections for Irish, slaves, freedmen and Native Americans.
Near cemetery, two restored 19th century log cabins chinked with sections of split log and and a mixture of clay and straw.
Outside are original French bread ovens.
69 Grace Lutheran Church Missouri Perry County, Uniontown Church, vernacular architecture, built 1876.
Brick frame and an imposing steeple.
Old cemetery behind church.
Public Spirituality; Cultural Diversity: German Lutheran settlers St. Joachim Catholic Church, Old Mines None Uniontown is one of seven closely grouped Lutheran communities.
Townsite settled 1839 by 15 charter members and called the Paitzdorf Settlement.
Church's present name adopted 1929 (was Old Lutheran Church of Paitzdorf for 90 years).
70 Tower Rock/ Superstition Rock Missouri Perry County, near Whitten-burg.
Rock is a short distance from the banks of Mississippi River; site is in the river.
Large rock formation.
When river is low, visitors may walk to rock.
During last century, settlers called this "superstition rock."
Public The river Sites in Altenburg None An interpretive sign or brochure would help to explain this story-which is indicative of the fears and beliefs of early settlers.
71 Odd Fellows Cemetery Missouri Mississippi County, Charleston City cemetery.
Buried here: Robert Anthony Hatcher (1819-1886), Missouri state representative, major in Confederate Army, representative in Confederate Congress.
Public Civil War St. Joachim Catholic Church, Burnt Mill, Island No. 10 Charleston Chamber of Commerce None 72 City Cemetery Missouri Cape Girardeau County, Cape Girardeau Cemetery features graves of settlers and prominent townspeople.
Public Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values St. Joachim Catholic cemetery, Grace Lutheran church, Odd Fellows cemetery Cape Girardeau Chamber of Commerce Buried here: Alexander Buckner (1785-1833), Missouri state senator, member of Missouri State Legislature.
73 Poplar Bluff Missouri Butler County, on U.S. Hwy 67 Named for a dense copse of yellow poplars that early travelers used as a land-mark.
Grew rapidly as a trading and logging center.
Many sites in town.
Historical Museum: early 20th century building, houses, logging-related tools and local items.
Public/Private People versus Nature; Vernacular Architecture Margaret Harwell Art Museum City and historical preservation groups have maintained all sites and interpret them.
Davis House: Folk Victorian, c. 1889, 19th century furnishings, 522 Cherry Street.
Spurlock Cabin, c. 1900, turn of century furnishings, W. Davis at 13th Street.
Frisco Depot, 1927, No longer in use; caboose and bagage car display, railroad memoribilia.
74 St. Mary of the Barrens.
Many sites on grounds: Church of the Assumption, Rare Book Musuem, Rosati's Cabin, and Seminary Missouri Perry County Musuem includes excerpts from a Guttenberg Bible.
Seminary founded by Venetian missionaries in 1818.
Oldest institution of higher learning west of the Mississippi River.
Public Spirituality; Cultural Diversity: Roman Catholic missionaries Grace Lutheran Church, St. Joachim Catholic Church Museum Perry County Courthouse features a Civil War statue of a Union soldier honoring the 1800 veterans of the county, donated by sons of the veterans.
Most Southern towns pay homage only to Confederate veterans.
75 Rolla Cemetery Missouri Phelps County, Rolla, MO. Buried here are townspeople and Civil War veterans.
Large headstone marked "Broadway" is the grave of a Gypsy who died in Rolla alongside Rt 66 here in 1964.
Since death of "Broadway," many area gypsies (continued in "comments") Public Vernacular creativity; Cultural Diversity: the Gypsy community Cowan cemetery, Folk art cemetery None Many area gypsies have been buried here.
Broadway's grave is adorned with carved wooden birds, flowers, and other vernacular art.
76 Conical and Slaughter Sinks Phelps County, near Rolla Two of the most spectacular sinkholes in Misssouri.
Conical; separated from road by a chain link fence, is approx.
100 ft deep and 300 ft in diameter.
Slaughter, adjacent to Conical, 150 yards N of the road, (continued in "comments") Private Brimstone Museum, Iron Furnaces Sinkholes and caves are prominent in Missouri, more so than in any other state.
The state's distinctive geology has pridigiously contributed to its history and culture.
Slaughter Sink is about 0.25 mile long and 175 ft. deep.
'Any development might disrupt the solitude of the site.
77 Burnt Mill Missouri St. Genevieve County Ruins of Stone Mill, built c. 1800, by Francois Valle II.
Mill burned in 1864 during the Civil War.
Remaining walls are 65 ft high.
Private Civil War Island No. 10, Cowan cemetery None Part of the site's distinction is its isolation.
78 Experimental Mines, University of Missouri, Rolla Campus Missouri Phelps County, in Rolla Mo. 19 acres; begun in 1914 on 7 acres.
Two underground mines and two small quarries are maintained for instruction and research.
Public People versus Nature; Building the American Economy Old Mines, Shot Tower Site Guided tours available University of Missouri - Rolla was created in 1871 as the Univ. of MO School of Mines and Metallurgy.
Testimony to the importance of the mining industry in the state's history.
79 Dillard Mill Missouri Crawford County, near Dillard Mill at the confluence of Huzzah and Indian Creeks, where a rock dam creates a waterfall that falls into a millpond.
Built c. 1900, restored to working order.
This red frame gristmill (situated on 132 acres) ground corn until 1960.
Original machinery.
Public People versus Nature; Building the American Economy; Vernacular Architecture Burnt Mill, Steen's Syrup Mill, Topaz Mill Picnic areas, trails, tours.
None 80 Route 66 sites in Sullivan, Mo Missouri Franklin County Two Rt. 66 sites-The Shamrock Motel, constructed of hand-cut stone, and a Mcdonald's restaurant remodeled as a memorial to Rt. 66 Private Recreation Rolla cemetery These are sites along a thoroughfare that has assumed mythic proportions.
The Shamrock is important as a cultural site along this historic road.
81 Emerson Park/Grant's Statue Missouri Iron County, Irontown Park.
First landscaped for the 1867 Lindsay-Emerson House, now part of St. Marie du Lac Catholic Church.
An 1886 bronze statue of a Union soldier was erected here (continued in "comments") Private Spirituality; Civil War; Expressing Cultural Values Iron County Courthouse, Rolla Cemetery Statue bears a descriptive marker.
Statue was erected by veterans of the 21st Illinois to commem-orate the spot where Grant received his commission as general.
After his promotion, Grant was put in charge of the District of Southeast Missouri (which included Southern Illinois).
82 Greenville, MO Missouri Wayne County Town has population of 437, but adjacent to town are remnants of "Old Greenville."
Public People versus Nature Brimstone Museum; mass grave for hurricane victims Map is available at Corps of Engineers office in nearby Wappapello, MO. Ruins of town coupled with map evoke a sense of the loss experienced by citizens.
Visitor senses historical tension between locals (heritage, pride) and government.
During Civil War, Greenville was fought over and almost half of the town structures were destroyed.
In 1938 the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers relocated the town while building dam to form Wappapello Lake.
83 Iron Furnaces Missouri Phelps County, near Newburg Site of Ozark Iron works, established 1873.
An 1833 financial panic brought ironworks to ruin.
Two large furnaces remain, along with the ruins of the ironworks' brick administration building.
Public People versus Nature; Building the American Economy Brimstone Museum, Shot Tower site Interpretive plaque During the 1930s the Alhambra Grotto of St. Louis, a degree of the Masonic Lodge, remodeled the administration building as resort for its members.
Burned in 1970.
84 Old Mountain Grove Missouri Wright County, town of Mountain Grove.
Remnants of town well mark the site of Old Mountain Grove.
As railroads came through the area, various closely spaced communities sprang up on the Wright-Texas County borders in anticipation of commerce.
Public Working People; Peopling Places Greenville, MO Chamber of Commerce.
Town square dedicated in 1915 by Vice President T. R. Marshall, rededicated 1987 by V.P. George Bush.
Town's demise is evidence of fierce competition in area near to railroad.
Towns of Mountain Grove and Eyan were established on neutral ground.
85 Boomland Missouri Mississippi County, Charleston, MO Fireworks emporium cum department store, displays a 1974 and 1975 Lincoln Continental Mark IV, one of which belonged to Elvis Presley, the other to his girlfriend Linda Thompson.
Also a cream-colored 1976 cadillac Elvis bought for a Denver policeman.
Private Recreation; Music Municipal Auditorium in Shreveport, Frankie Jean's Pik Quick Highly developed for visitor use.
Elvis merchandise sold.
86 Vera Cruz, MO Missouri Douglas County Cemetery and original town remnants (a rock building and the dam of a former mill) Private Building the American Economy Old Mountain Grove, MO; Greenville, MO None Vera Cruz was the county seat 1857-1869.
Boundary changes of Douglas County led to bitter rivalries for county seat that continued into 20th century.
Many courthouses were burned and court records stolen.
87 Abandoned Sharecropper's Cabin Missouri Pemiscot County, Wardell Abandoned dwelling 20 feet from road Public Working People; Building the American Economy; Vernacular Architecture New Madrid Historical Museum None; surrounding land still farmed by present owner.
House is indicative of share-cropping system and the living conditions fostered by such a system.
88 Dunklin County Museum Missouri Dunklin County, Kennet Contains the Birthright letters, a collection of correspondence between former slaves and their owners, as well as artifacts detailing the county's history and culture.
Public Race relations; Slavery New Madrid Historical Museum Museum Contains a record-size alligator gar. 89 Hornersville Swamp Conservation Area Missouri Dunklin County, near Hornersville This 3,166-acre preserve with a variety of local fauna provides an example of how the Missouri Boothill appeard before the creation of the Little River Drainage District.
.
Public People versus Nature; Manipulating the Environment; Building the American Economy Shot Tower Site, Old Mines, MO Missouri Department of Conservation maintains area.
Hunting, fishing, hiking, camping, nature study, etc., available.
Little River Drainage District, created in 1905, is the largest privately funded drainage system in the world.
Its creation converted the boothill from swamp to farmland.
90 Skyline Automobile Loop Missouri Carter County, Near Van Buren Route gives broad, scenic views of hardwood-pine ridges, hollows, the town of Van Buren, granite-topped Stegall Mountain, and a 1,000-foot ridge.
Public Recreation New Madrid Historical Museum None Good example of rugged terrain of Eastern Ozarks.
91 Indian Trail State Fish Hatchery Missouri Dent County, near Salem, Facility is basically unchanged since CCC built it in 1938.
Water is supplied by gravity-assisted pipes from Blackwell Lake.
No water activities on lake.
Public Native American issues; Agriculture Cowan Cemetery Available for visitors.
Signs for a section of the Trail of Tears, which passed through the present park.
92 Harlin House Museum Missouri Howell County, West Plains, Museum is housed in an 1889 vernacular architecture building; contains an art gallery, as well as a museum detailing history and culture of the area.
Private Recreation; Music; Sports Meadows Art Museum; Moses Austin's grave Museum Contains artifacts and memoribilia of former residents, such as baseball players Preacher Roe and Bill Virdon, and entertainers Porter Waggoner and Jan Howard.
93 Mine La Motte Missouri Madison County By 1725, Phillip Renault was producing 1,500 pounds of lead here per day in one of Missouri's first mines.
Evidence of mining activity can be seen along SR OO, which runs through town.
Private Working People; People versus Nature; Building the American Economy Old Mines, MO; Shot Tower Site Interpretive marker None 94 Wilderness, MO Missouri Oregon County Small town composed of a former WPA Folk school (now a church), one gro-cery store, and a former gas station.
Land original-ly bought by a Catholic Church in Old Mines, MO, (continued in "comments") Private Diversity of populace (Irish laborers) Rolla Cemetery None Land originally bought for Irish railroad workers and immigrants affected by the Panic of 1857; 40 families settled in area by 1859, but forced to flee by marauders during Civil War.
Town exists today due to the lumber industry.
95 Rockbridge, MO Missouri Ozark County Former county seat of Ozark County.
Still standing: a 3-story frame mill, a restored 1903 bank, and an 1894 general store.
Site is part of a fish and game complex.
Private Building the American Economy Dillard Mill Visitors are welcome to tour buildings, but owner's primary concern is running a fishing and game preserve.
None 96 Centerville Courthouse Missouri Reynolds County Centerville One of Missiouri's oldest courthouses still in use.
Built 1874.
Vernacular classical revival architecture; made of handmade bricks.
Set in a park-like enclosure and fenced by a stone wall.
Public Vernacular architecture Rolla Cemetery Courthouse is still in use, but grounds are open to public.
Original courthouse destroyed in Civil War.
Several polished granite markers honor the citizens of Reynolds Co. who have served in wars since WW I.
Also, the old jail is adjacent to courthouse and is currently used for record storage.
97 Current River Heritage Museum Missouri Ripley County, Doniphan This 7,000-sq. ft. museum, established 1922, contains extensive county historical records, as well as historical artifacts and area arts and crafts.
Public Meadows art Museum, Museum/Moses Austin's grave Museum One of few museums in area still in operation after 70 years 98 Stoddard County Museum Missouri Stoddard County Bloomfield An old red brick church houses historical items: tools, furniture, and one of only three existing copies of the first edition of The Stars and Stripes.
Public Civil War Rolla Cemetery, Burnt Mill Museum Plaque at courthouse.
The Stars and Stripes is the official newspaper of the Overseas Dept of Defense.
First printed in Bloomfield on Nov 9, 1861 by four Federal soldiers.
99 Bonne Terre Memorial Library Missouri St. Francois County, Bonne Terre Italian Renaissance architecture, built c. 1905.
Exquisite detailing.
Built from dressed limestone by St. Joseph Lead Co. president Dwight Jones.
Public Recreation Shot Tower Site, Creswell Furnace Visitors welcome; information detailing library's history available inside.
Includes a marble fireplace, an oak interior and an 18th century grandfather clock.
Bonne Terre was once a successful lead-mining town.
St. Joseph Lead Co. became the largest mining company in southeast Missouri by 1900.
100 R. T. Martin tobacco Factory Kentucky Muhlenberg County.
Central City Tobacco factory from early part of 20th Century Private Building the American Economy; Working People; tobacco-related experience Rice Tobacco Company Unknown Tobacco factories are rare.
101 Ephraigm McClean Brank Burial Site Kentucky Muhlenberg County, Central City Gravesite of War of 1812 veteran Private History Unknown Open to public Brank is considered to have been a main force in American Victory in Battle of New Orleans.
102 Gen. Simon Bolivar Birthplace Kentucky Muhlenberg County, Central City Birthplace of Civil War general.1830s log cabin out in country, off main road.
Private Civil War Other Civil War sites No visitor services Part of adjoining furnace still remains but has been dynamited.
103 Mose Rager House and Monument Kentucky Muhlenberg County, Drakesboro Home of guitarist who taught Merle Travis how to play Private Expressing Cultural Values: music Potential to be on music tour of Muhlenberg County No visitor services NA 104 Merle Travis gravesite Kentucky Muhlenberg County, Ebenezer Large monument marking grave of guitar legend Merle Travis.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: music Potential to be on music tour of Muhlenberg County No visitor services Cemetery is off highway 176, 10 miles outside Central City.
105 Jesse Oats gravesite Kentucky Muhlenberg County, Central City Gravesite of Revolutionary War Hero Jesse Oats Private History Unknown Open to public NA 106 James Clark McReynolds Gravesite Kentucky Todd County, Elkton Gravesite of Supreme Court justice Private Building the American Economy; Working People; tobacco-related experience McReynolds House; Rice and R. T. Martin Tobacco Companies Open to public NA 107 James Clark McReynolds House Kentucky Todd County, Elkton Two-story frame house of Supreme Court justice Private Building the American Economy; Working People; tobacco-related experience McReynolds Gravesite; Rice and R. T. Martin Tobacco Companies Unknown The justice was influential in declaring tobacco trust, which led to Black Patch Tobacco wars being found unconstitutional.
108 Robert Penn Warren birthplace Kentucky Todd County, Guthrie One-story brick house Private Vernacular Architecture Unknown Open to public Birthplace of Pulitzer prize- winning author.
109 Downtown Guthrie Kentucky Todd County, Guthrie Was host to massive association rally of 25,000-30,000 people in early 20th century Various Tobacco-related experience Night Riders-related sites Unknown NA 110 Allensville Festival Kentucky Todd County, Allensville Festival started by freed slaves lasts a full week, ending on August 8.
Includes baseball game, barbecue, etc.
None Cultural Diversity: race issues Unknown Unknown NA 111 Jefferson Davis Monument Kentucky Todd County, Fairview Obelisk 351 feet high marks Confederate president's gravesite Daughters of the Confederacy Civil War Other Civil War sites Open to public, elevator to top NA 112 Ben Bristow Birthplace Kentucky Todd County, Elkton Gates of birthplace Unknown Civil War Other Civil War sites No visitor services NA 113 Fort Smith Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Union Civil War fort on Cemetery Hill in Smithland Public Civil War Other Civil War sites Potential for museum to house finds of archeological dig.
Fort was used as a training ground for Union troops.
he townspeople, although siding with the Confederacy, did not protest, in order to save their town from destruction.
114 Smithland First Baptist Church Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Church that survived the floods of 1913 and 1937.
Private Spirituality; People versus Nature Unknown Unknown NA 115 Second Baptist Church Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 1860 Structure Private Civil War, Spirituality Civil War sites Unknown Building that now houses Second Baptist Church originally was used as Masonic Lodge in 1860; also used as a Civil War commissary.
It was the wardrobe building for filming of How the West was Won..
116 The Old Bank Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Church built in 1907 Private Spirituality; Expressing Cultural Values: movies Unknown Unknown Used as Bank of Albany, New York, in filming of How the West was Won. 117 The Smith Mansion Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 10,000-square-foot home that is a replica of Southfork, the Dallas estate.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: television Unknown Has been opened to local people in the past Built in place of a renovated home ca. 1940.
118 The Buzzard's Roost Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Gazebo Built in place of Cottonwood Tree to offer shelter to local gatherings.
Unknown Vernacular Architecture Unknown Open to the public This gathering place has been featured in the Baltimore Sun as a site of local color.
Men gather to tell stories and play checkers; there is a guest register.
The Gazebo was named after a railroad that ran along the river in the late 1800s.
119 Brimstone Corner Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Saloon, site of a popular local legend Unknown History; Cultural Diversity Unknown Unknown Legend says that patrons of the saloon were drugged and killed, then slid through a trap door to the doctor next door, who performed experiments and had the bodies buried on Cumberland Island by a slave.
120 Bell Tavern Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Inn built in 1815 Private Expressing Cultural Values: literature; History; Mississippi River Unknown Open to public Charles Dickens, Clara Barton, John James Audubon, Aaron Burr, Henry Clay, and Lew Wallace visited here.
Purportedly was the model for the inn in Great Expectations.
121 Statue of Henry Clay Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Statue carved from tree under which Henry Clay held court Private Expressing Cultural Values; History Unknown Open to public Statue carved from "Judge Elm," tree where hangings were carried out in 19th century.
Carved by Kenneth Cruse of Mexico, KY. 122 Massey House Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Oldest residence in Smithland Private History; Cultural Diversity: race issues Civil War sites Unknown Legend says this house, which contains a trap door in a closet leading to a tunnel, was part of the Underground Railroad..
123 Dallum-Bush House Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 1839 house Private Civil War; Slavery; Cultural Diversity: race issues Civil War sites Unknown Slaves were housed in back part of house.
First Livingston County Court Clerk's office was here.
During Civil War, was known as "Blount Hodge's Country Club," because of parties held there.
124 Old Methodist Church Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 1848 church Private Spirituality; People versus Nature; Slavery; Race Issues, Man against Nature, Spirituality Unknown Unknown Originally had balcony for salves.
Destroyed by force in 1880s; rebuilt using former walls and foundation.
Survived 1937 flood, which came to building roof.
125 Davis House/Rudd House Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 1840 house Private Vernacular Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values: family Unknown Unknown House once occupied by devout baseball fan Katie Davis Love, who became reclusive during baseball season and had groceries sent to her room in a basket on a string.
House has a "safe room" upstairs with only entrance a staircase from parents' room.
126 Pippin Cabin Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland 1843 log cabin within a frame house, restored Unknown Vernacular Architecture Unknown Visitor Center for Smithland Legend says cabin was once used for gambling and a man was killed over a craps dispute.
127 Lucy Jefferson Lewis gravesite Kentucky Livingston County, Smithland Gravesite of Thomas Jefferson's sister.
Public History Unknown Unknown Legend around family was the subject of a Robert Penn Warren book.
128 Coil House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1835 two-story Federal house Private Expressing Cultural Values: family Old ship was owned by Matthew Lyon's brother.
Unknown Oldest home in Madisonville.
It is owned by son of Chittendon Lyon, for whom Lyon county was named.
129 Smith Dulin House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1904 two-story house Private Vernacular Architecture; Building the American Economy Unknown Unknown Built by owner of a local department store.
Used for a WPA project from 1938 to 1941.
130 East Broadway School Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1884 School building, now a private residence.
Private Education Unknown Unknown Housed Madisonville Normal School from 1884 to 1907, then became East Broadway School.
Closed in 1925; restored in 1975.
131 Hockersmith House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1881 French Mansard style house Private Architecture; Civil War Other Civil War sites; L. D. Hockersmith gravesite Unknown Capt. L. D. Hockersmith, who built the house, helped plan escape of John Hunt Morgan from penitentiary in Columbus, Ohio.
French mansard style is rare in this part of the country.
132 Captain L. D. Hockersmith gravesite Kentucky Hopkins County, West Madisonville 1913 gravesite of CSA captain Unknown Civil War Other Civil War sites; Hockersmith House Open to public Grave of CS A captain who escaped from penitentiary in Columbus, Ohio.
133 Old Ship.
Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1857 home of Chittenden Lyon, son of Chittenden Lyon, for whom Lyon County was named.
Private Vernacular Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values: family Home of Matthew Lyon, Chittenden's brother, is also on the survey.
Unknown NA 134 Ruby House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville Mid-1800s house Private Vernacular Architecture Unknown Unknown Built for its owner by a lumber company, this was the first home in Madisonville to have electricity.
135 Hammack House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1890 Victorian house Private Vernacular Architecture; Cultural Diversity; Building the American Economy Unknown Unknown Used as a boarding house in 19-teens; later rented by of Congressman David Kincheloe, who had been a federal judge.
136 Morton House Kentucky Hopkins County, Madisonville 1857 log cabin made into a neo-classical house Private Expressing Cultural Values: Family; Vernacular Architecture; Civil War; Spirituality Unknown Unknown Sold in 1979 after being owned by same family for over 100 years.
Leisure use by Civil War soldiers.
137 Weathers House Kentucky Todd County, Elkton Built in 1882 Private Building the American Economy Unknown Unknown Named for owner of Weathers drug store, early 1900s, which still stands in town.
Also served as boardinghouse.
138 Stagecoach Inn Kentucky Todd County, Tiny Town 1833 inn Private Cultural Diversity; Civil War; Expressing Cultural Diversity: music Unknown Unknown Served stagecoach line in early 1800s.
Local legend says building was used as a Confederate hospital during Civil War.
Possibly birthplace of African blackface minstrel.
139 Bethel Baptist Church Kentucky Todd County, Fairview Site for this church was a gift from Jefferson Davis Private Spirituality; Civil War Jefferson Davis monument, also in Fairview Unknown NA 140 Garth House Kentucky Todd County, Trenton 1880s Victorian house with brick facade remaining, which is a rarity.
Private Civil War; Expressing Cultural Values Unknown Unknown Built by Civil War veteran Dudley Garth.
Cemetery behind house, not adjacent.
Windows are low to ground because funerals were held here and caskets were slid in and out of windows.
141 Trigg County Log Cabin Museum, Boots Randolph home Kentucky Trigg County, Cadiz 1867 log cabin moved to center of town Chamber of Commerce Vernacular Architecture; History; Expressing Cultural Values: music Unknown Open to public Home of saxophonist Boots Randolph 142 Kelsey Calhoun, Main Street Moonshiner Kentucky Trigg County, Cadiz For TVA, demonstrates operation of miniature moonshine still mounted on plywood.
Also proof tester.
Private Building the American Economy; Cultural Diversity Unknown Open to giving demonstration for Park Service.
NA 143 Barlow House Museum Kentucky Ballard County, near Paducah Museum in turn-of-the-century Victorian house Unknown Architecture; General History Unknown $2 admission; open Fridays, Sundays, and Mondays 1-4 p.m. 200 years of memorabilia of town's founding family 144 Wickliffe Mounds Research Center Kentucky Ballard County, Wickliffe Museum on site of Indian mounds from 1000-1350 Unknown Native American issues Unknown $3.50 admission; open Mar.-Nov. 9-4:30; accessible for disabled Features two large rectangular platform mounds used in ceremonies.
145 R. N. Henson Broom- maker's Museum Kentucky Fulton County, Cayce Contains largest private collection of broom-making equipment in country.
Private Building the American Economy Unknown Can see by appointment.
Not accessible for persons with disabilities.
Home of original leather Kentucky cabin broom.
146 Warren Thomas Museum Kentucky Fulton County, Hickman Antebellum black church housing local African- American history items Unknown Cultural Diversity Unknown By appointment NA 147 Hardin Southern Railroad Nostalgia Train Kentucky Marshall County, Hardin Trip on 100-year-old rail line; 18 miles, 2 hours Unknown Building the American Economy; Recreation Unknown Fee $10, May 27-Oct 29, Sats. and Suns.
1 p.m. and 3:30 p.m. NA 148 Don F Pratt Museum Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville Museum of 101st Airborne division, the "Screaming Eagles" U.S. government Aviation Unknown Admission free; open daily 9:30-4:30 Features helicopters, other aircraft 149 Kentucky Opry Kentucky Marshall County Music show featuring country, bluegrass, and gospel Unknown Expressing Cultural Values: music Unknown 8 p.m. Fris. and Sats. year- round, $8.50 NA 150 John James Audubon State Park Kentucky Henderson County, Henderson Museum featuring collection of famed naturalist State Natural Environment Unknown Fee $4; open 10-5 daily; closed Thanksgiving; access for people with disabilities NA 151 Pennyroyal Area Museum Kentucky Christian County.
Hopkinsville Museum contains Night Riders artifacts, Native American art; Jefferson Davis possessions.
Unknown Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: art; Civil War; tobacco-related experience Trail of Tears commemorative site; Night Riders; Civil War sites Fee $2 ; open M-F 8:30-4:30, Sat. 10-3 NA 152 Broadbent's Country Ham Festival Kentucky Trigg County, Cadiz Ham festival N/A Expressing Cultural Values: food Unknown Visitors welcome Boasts "World's largest" country ham and biscuit festival 153 Henry Cornelius Burnett Gravesite Kentucky Trigg County, Cadiz KY Gravesite Unknown Civil War Other Civil War sites Open to public; could be part of Civil War gravesite tour Grave of U.S. representative from Kentucky and Senator in Confederate Congress.
East end cemetery.
154 Union County Historical Society and Museum Kentucky Union County, Morganfield Museum with local artifacts and Native American art Union County Historical Society Expressing Cultural Values: art; Native American issues Trail of Tears Commemorative site Unknown NA 155 Courthouse Lawn Kentucky Union County, Morganfield Site of Abraham Lincoln's only political speech given in native state.
City History Similar to Judge Elm in Smithland Open to public NA 156 Camp Breckinridge Kentucky Union County U.S. Army base U.S. government Military History; Cultural Diversity; Recreation Unknown Unknown Base housed largest POW camp in U.S. during World War II.
This location is also where Jackie Robinson began his baseball career in 1944.
157 Cale Young Rice House Kentucky Webster County, Dixon Home of local poet and his philanthropist wife, Leban Lace Rice Unknown Expressing Cultural Values: literature; Cultural Diversity Unknown Open to public Rice wrote a number of poems, including, "Bridging the Years," "The Passionate Follies," "Mrs. Wiggs of the Cabbage Patch."
158 Battle of Burt Mill Kentucky Webster County, Vanderburg Site of first Civil War Battle in Kentucky Unknown Civil War Other Civil War sites Unknown NA 159 Maplewood Cemetery: Wooldridge Monuments Kentucky Graves County, Mayfield Statues of members of the Henry Wooldridge family carved in Italian marble and sandstone Unknown Expressing Cultural Values: family, vernacular art Maplewood Cemetery Open to public; walking tour of cemetery Much folklore and legend surround the history of this monument, "the strange procession that never moves."
160 Maplewood Cemetery: Civil War Execution Kentucky Graves County, Mayfield Slab describes death of Henry B. Hicks in 1864--executed in Mayfield by Union Army Unknown Civil War Maplewood Cemetery Open to public; walking tour of cemetery NA 161 Maplewood Cemetery: Lois Roach gravesite Kentucky Graves County, Mayfield Gravesite of first female sheriff in Kentucky, maybe first in America Unknown Cultural Diversity gender issues; Working People Maplewood Cemetery Open to public; walking tour of cemetery NA 162 Maplewood Cemetery: Mass Burial Kentucky Graves County, Mayfield Eleven people in one family killed in a 1921 house fire were buried together.
Unknown Tragedy Maplewood Cemetery Open to public; walking tour of cemetery NA 163 Maplewood Cemetery: Col. Edward Crossland Kentucky Graves County, Mayfield Gravesite Unknown Civil War; History Maplewood Cemetery Open to public; walking tour of cemetery Edward Crossland was a Colonel in the Confederacy and later a member of U.S. House of Representatives.
164 Starnes Barbecue Kentucky McCracken County, Paducah Barbecue place 40 years old Private Expressing Cultural Values: food Unknown Restaurant, busy at lunch Situated around a counter; serves pork, ham, and beef BBQ on toast, hot barbecue sauce.
165 Homeplace 1850 Kentucky Lyon County, southern end of LBL Living history farm with 16 original log structures Unknown Tobacco-related experience Night Riders sites Open to public Living history demonstrations of tobacco firing, plowing, and buttermaking.
166 Hopkinsville First Presbyterian Church Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville 1849 church Private Spirituality, Civil War Civil War Hopkinsville walking tour Was used as a hospital during Civil War 167 Carnegie Library Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville 1913 Library designed by local architect Unknown Education, Vernacular Architecture Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour NA 168 Latham Cottages Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville.
Cottages Unknown Cultural Diversity; Building the American Economy Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour First Rental property in city, also first with running water, gas heat, and lighting.
169 L 
Unknown Building the American Economy: railroads Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour NA 170 Dayton Building Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville 1905 building Unknown Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour Building was used for several readings by well-known clairvoyant Edgar Cayce.
171 Alhambra Theatre Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville First Building in Hopkinsviille with air conditioning Unknown Building the American Economy: technological advances Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour NA 172 Ferrell's Snappy Service Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville Fast-food restaurant opened in 1936 Private Expressing Cultural Values: food Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour Burger joint" still serves burgers today and is a town institution.
173 Pioneer Cemetery Kentucky Christian County, Hopkinsville.
Cemetery.
Last burial in 1873.
Unknown Peopling Places; Cultural Diversity Unknown Hopkinsville walking tour Contains statue of to town founder, Bartholomew Wood, and 222 graves of settlers, including two Revolutionary War soldiers.
174 Major League Training Camp Field Kentucky Hopkins County, Dawson Springs Location where Pittsburgh Pirates played spring training in 1910s Private, but trying to be restored Expressing Cultural Values: sports, recreation Unknown Hopes to be open to public NA 175 Henry Bennett Gravesite Kentucky Livingston County, Dycusburg Inscription on tombstone reads "Killed by the Nightriders."
Unknown Tobacco-related experience Night Riders sites Open to public Bennett was beaten but not killed by the Night Riders terrorist group.
176 National Scouting Museum Kentucky Calloway County, Murray Interactive museum telling story of Boy Scouts.
Unknown Cultural Diversity; Education; Expressing Cultural Values: art Unknown Admission, $5; open March through November State of the art museum contains a collection of Norman Rockwell art.
177 McClean County Civil War Days Kentucky McLean County Annual event, third weekend in May N/A Civil War Civil War sites Open to public Each year the 1861 Battle of Sacramento is re-created, wherein Gen. Nathan Bedford Forrest first used his famous flanking strategy.
178 Historic Green and Rough River overlook Kentucky McLean County, Livermore Converted railroad bridge first used in 1871.
Unknown Building the American Economy: railroads; Natural Environment None Open to public Visitors can climb steps of converted railroad bridge to see the confluence of the Green and Rough Rivers.
179 Arkansas Riverboat Co., "The Spirit" Arkansas Pulaski County, North Little Rock, Riverfront Park 150-passenger boat makes scheduled cruises Private Recreation NA NA 180 Grayhawk Frontier Town Arkansas Lonoke County, Cabot Re-created pioneer town Private Working People; People versus Nature NA NA NA 181 Pickles Gap Village Arkansas Faulkner County, north of Conway Crafts, arts, petting zoo, dining in re-created 19th century shops Private Recreation NA NA NA 182 Arkansas Arts Center Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, MacArthur Park Drawings and prints of Arkansas and national artists; Arkansas Children's Theater base NA Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts NA NA NA 183 Arkansas Carousel Restoration Studio Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock World's only remaining Herschell-Spillman track carousel NA Recreation; Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts NA NA NA 184 Arkansas Governor's Mansion Arkansas Pulaski County; Little Rock Home of all Arkansas governors since 1950 NA NA NA NA NA 185 Arkansas Museum of Science and History Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, MacArthur Park Birthplace of Gen. Douglas MacArthur in 1880; former Little Rock Arsenal.
Historic and scientific collections.
NA History; World War II; Civil War NA Project is underway to make this a military museum.
Military arsenal, founded in 1838, was first military arsenal established west of the Mississippi.
Also was site of civil war conflict.
186 Arkansas State Capitol Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock Building modeled on the U. S. Capitol Public Government NA NA Construction began 1899; Arkansas legislature first convened here in 1911.
187 Arkansas Territorial Restoration Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock Oldest structures in Little Rock date to territorial days; was a tavern.
Living history representation of slavery, craft shops, artists' exhibits, Cromwell Exhibition Hall, history wall, tours.
Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts, crafts; Architecture, cotton-centered experience NA NA Living history representation of slavery is a personal experience that gives visitors a sense of history more than any other exhibit.
House of and exhibit on William Woodruff, founder of the Arkansas Gazette, state's first newspaper, which still exists.
188 Bauxite Museum Arkansas Saline County; Bauxite Displays from early mining days of town that was once the center of U.S. aluminum production NA Working People; Building the American Economy; Cultural Diversity; Resource Extraction Outside Benton, near Little Rock Enthusiastic museum staff with interesting stories.
Site may become a wildlife refuge.
Company town 1893-1968.
Some workers were black, Italian, and Mexican.
Mexicans lived in a tent city called "Mexico Camp."
Many people who worked for company still live in area and express positive feelings toward mining.
189 Camp Nelson Cemetery Arkansas Lonoke County, Cabot Monument to unknown Texas and Arkansas Confederate soldiers NA Civil War NA NA NA 190 Daniel Greathouse Home Arkansas Faulkner County, Conway 19th-century structure with dogtrot style cabin NA Architecture NA NA NA 191 Decorative Arts Museum Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock Located in historic Pike-Fletcher-Terry house; features permanent and traveling displays NA Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts.
NA NA NA 192 Gann Museum Arkansas Saline County, Benton World's only bauxite structure, built in 1893.
Museum retells mining background and other local history.
NA Architecture; Working People NA NA One-of-a-kind attraction 193 Little Rock Central High School Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, High School where 1957 integration crisis took place NA Cultural Diversity; Civil Rights NA Unknown; could not find out what exhibits on the 1957 incident are in existence.
The 1957 incident at this school became a milestone in the fight for desegregation.
194 Marlsgate Plantation Arkansas Pulaski County, Scott Turn-of-the-century plantation home, restored with vintage furniture and accessories NA Vernacular Architecture, cotton-centered experience NA NA NA 195 Mosaic Templars of America Headquarters Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Built in 1911; headquarters of one of the largest African-American fraternal organizations NA Cultural Diversity NA NA NA 196 Old Mill Arkansas Pulaski County, North Little Rock, Re-creation of a water-powered grist mill, featured in movie Gone with the Wind.
Public Agriculture; Developing the American Economy NA NA Beautiful site, very accessible 197 Old State House Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Greek revival architecture; now a museum of state history, NA Architecture NA NA This building was the site of Clinton's victory parties in 1992 and 1996.
198 Plantation Agriculture Museum Arkansas Pulaski County, Scott, Museum focuses on cotton and its role in the south NA Working people; cotton-centered experience NA NA NA 199 Quapaw Quarter Historic District Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Restored Antebellum and Victorian structures.
NA Architecture NA Driving and walking tours available NA 200 Shoppach House Arkansas Saline County, Benton 1853 house occupied by North and South during the Civil War Private Architecture, Civil War NA Tours by appointment NA 201 Blues Corner Arkansas Phillips County, Helena, Collection of recordings and sheet music featuring Delta Blues.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: music NA NA NA 202 Heart of Arkansas Farm Tours Arkansas Chicot County, Dermott Tours to rice and soybean farming operations, Stuttgart Agricultural Museum, and prairie lands.
NA Building the American Economy: agriculture NA Unknown NA 203 Old Almer Store Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Plantation store built in 1872 and restored for Arkansas bicentennial; now Delta arts and crafts NA Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts, folk art NA NA NA 204 Town of Clarendon Arkansas Monroe County, between the White River and highway 79 Small settlement, originally called "mouth of cache," dates back to 1799 and has persisted as a travel junction since 1837, when a military crossing from Memphis to Little Rock allowed for the creation of a township.
NA Working People; People versus Nature; Civil War The Roc Roe Bayou is connected to the White River, and a cannon sunk in what was then called Hart Lake has never been recovered.
Factory work crafted oars and pearl buttons shaped from mussels found in the river.
Hull of sunken ship still visible when river is low; no marker on the site.
Town nearly destroyed June 24, 1864, after Confed.
Gen. Joseph O. Shelby's Missouri brigade sank Union gunboat, Queen City near townsite.
Ship never raised.
Town suffered.
in 1927 flood.
Old ferrys marked the site.
205 New Deal Market Arkansas Ouachita County, Camden Family-owned grocery store founded by Chinese immigrant in 1948; first operated as a general store Private Cultural Diversity; Working People; Building the American Economy Camden is a river town with a rich antebellum history No historical markings on site Mr. Lee Lum met U.S. Senator David Pryor's father, Edgar, on a trip through Camden to Hot Springs, and the two discussed the practicality of opening a grocery store.
The store is now owned by the second generation of the family.
206 Palmer's Grocery Store Arkansas Ouachita County, 'Camden Grocery and feed store founded in 1928 Private Working People Camden No visitor services on the site Founder Milo Parker Palmer, a mess sergeant in WW I, opened a grocery store and hired out as a cook to local groups, also worked as a butcher.
Leased 1,100 acres for $40 a yr. to grow feed.
Store now in second generation of ownership.
207 Hampton Church Cemetery Arkansas Calhoun County, Hampton Gravesites of a military captain and his blind wife Public Spirituality, Military NA NA Military captain took in two girls who survived the Mountain Meadow massacre in Utah, one of whom was blinded in the attack.
He left them with a church in Hampton church, and after years of correspondence he married the blind girl.
208 Sacred Heart Academy (former home of Col. Henry Biscoe Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Founded as a convent by four sisters of mercy and Bishop Henry Byrne from Ireland in 1858 in former Biscoe residence NA Spirituality; Civil War Helena Marker onsite Founded as a convent; was a hospital during 1863 battle of Helena.
Closed in 1868; reopened 1879 by Sisters of Charity.
209 Paragould Mural Arkansas Greene County, Paragould 200-foot mural depicting early transportation in a town formed by two intersecting railroads.
NA Working People; Building the American Economy: railroads NA Was owned by two men named Paramour and Jay Gould; names were combined to form Paragould.
Gould did not like having second billing.
Arkansas has a number of murals depicting local history.
The art form provides an attractive and relatively inexpensive way of celebrating history.
210 Sea Wall Mural Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Mural depicts blues history and early Helena history NA History; Expressing Cultural Values: music Behind the Delta Cultural Center NA 211 Southland Greyhound Park Arkansas Crittenden County, West Memphis One of the largest greyhound racing facilities in the country.
Private Recreation NA NA 212 Arkansas County Museum Arkansas Arkansas County, south of Gillett Collection of Delta structures, including farm equipment; also focuses on country doctors NA Building the American Economy: agriculture; Cultural Diversity NA Unknown NA 213 Arkansas Post National Memorial Arkansas Arkansas County, south of Gillett Has been a French fort and a Spanish fort, site of skirmish after American Revolution, a river port, site of a civil war battle, territorial capital State.
Was French, Spanish, French again, then American Peopling Places; Cultural Diversity: Native American, French, Spanish; Revolutionary War; Civil War; Colonialism; Working People (trade), Early Exploration Early settlers, explorers include Henri de Tonti, Robert La Salle; naturalists John James Audubon and Thomas Nuttall visited Visitor center, barrier-free trails, fishing areas; comprehensive study by Morris S. Arnold: Colonial Arkansas 1686-1804 (1991) First lower Mississippi River Valley settlement established by de Tonti in 1686; developed as trading station after La Salle in 1682; site of John Law's colony, ca. 1719.
First slaves in area 1721.
214 Centennial Baptist Church Arkansas Phillips County, Helena African-American church designed by African-American architect Henry James Price Church Spirituality; Architecture; Cultural Diversity Helena has several points of interest, most dealing with the blues or other aspects of Delta life NA Church grew from 23 members in 1879 to more 1,000 members in 1922.
215 Arkansas City Arkansas Desha County, Arkansas City Small town that was on the Mississippi River before 1927 flood.
Several buildings in need of restoration.
Courthouse clock was restored 1996.
NA Mississippi River; Cultural Diversity; People versus Nature; Building the American Economy: steamboats; Recreation Arkansas City stands by itself.
It is not on the Great River Road, but it should be.
Perhaps best possibility for re-creating a river town.
Excellent opportunity exists.
Visitors could get a feeling for life on the Mississippi.
Town has nearly died after 1927 flood and resulting change in river course.
Was steeped in steam-boat culture; 17 saloons and no churches.
Streets were named for famous steamboats such as Robert E. Lee and Kate Adams.
216 Chalk Bluff Park Arkansas Clay County, north of St. Francis Civil War battle site NA Civil War NA Unknown NA 217 Dallas County Museum Arkansas Dallas County, Fordyce Museum, housed in 1907 building, has displays on a local physician, Bear Bryant, and Adm. Thach, inventor of the Thach Weave, an aerial fighting tactic.
Also has displays on local Native American culture.
NA History; Native Americans; Working People; Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values: sports Fordyce was a lumber center around the turn of the century.
Displays are informed, but more information is needed on country physicians and on projectile points to put them in proper perspective.
This museum could use some help in research; probably has less than extravagant, financial backing.
218 Tontitown Arkansas Washington County, Tontitown Italian settlement formed by settlers unsatisfied with labor agreements NA Working People; Cultural Diversity NA NA 219 Rowher Arkansas Desha County, Rowher Internment camp where Japanese-Americans were held during WW II NA Cultural Diversity; World War II; Patriotism Jerome, Arkansas also had a relocation center.
State parks have reported much interest in developing the two sites in recent years.
Only a marker stands at Rowher.
Japanese-American citizens have created a garden.
Others have said the site is very moving.
Deaths in the camp, 24; others were killed in the armed services in Europe, including in 442nd Japanese-American unit of the 100th battalion, which distinguished itself in WW II combat .
220 Confederate Cemetery Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Historic Confederate burial ground laid out on the upsurge of Crowley's Ridge NA Civil War Helena NA 221 Crittenden County Museum Arkansas Crittenden County; Earle Museum, in Missouri Pacific depot, has exhibit on rural physicians, collections of artifacts.
NA Working People; Building the American Economy: railroads NA NA 222 Phillips County Museum Arkansas Phillips County, Helena, Museum with Civil War memorabilia, local history Public Mississippi River; Civil War NA NA 223 Desha County Museum Arkansas Desha County, Dumas, Re-creation of life in a typical south Arkansas farming community; emphasis on pioneer life NA Building the American Economy;' Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: family, cotton-related experiences; Agriculture NA Excellent visitor services, but open only two afternoons a week Grounds are well kept 224 Poison Spring Battleground Historical Monument Arkansas Ouachita County, west of Camden Site where Confederate soldiers captured a Union supply train in 1864 Public Civil War Marks Mills is also a battle site connected with the Red River campaign.
Supply train was captured during the Union's ill-fated Red River campaign.
225 Tate Barn Sale Arkansas Ouachita County, Tate Barn Major arts and crafts festival held in the oldest building in the county NA Vernacular Architecture; Expressing Cultural Values: festivals Camden NA 226 Indian Summer Pow-Wow Arkansas Ouachita County, Camden Traditional Native American dancing, competition, arts, food NA Cultural Diversity: Native Americans Camden Unknown NA 227 Southern Arkansas University Arkansas Columbia County; Magnolia Tour of agricultural school, Ozmer House, and 1883 dogtrot structure NA Vernacular Architecture; agriculture NA NA 228 Emerson Rotary Tiller races Arkansas Columbia County, Emersons Rotary tiller races NA NA NA 229 Marks Mills Battleground and Cemetery Arkansas Cleveland County, Marks Mills 1864 battle site; cemetery is also resting place of early settlers NA Civil War Marks Mills was part of the Union's Red River campaign NA 230 Armadillo Festival Arkansas Ashley County, Hamburg Festival oriented toward children NA NA NA NA 231 Ashley County Museum Arkansas Ashley County, Hamburg Museum in 1918 two-story house.
Large shed houses collection of horse-drawn vehicles.
Ashley County Historical Society Cultural Diversity: Native Americans; Agriculture, NA Unknown Sleighs, wagons, and farm tools in large shed.
Museum emphasizes clothing, furniture, local history, including Native American.
232 Phil's Antique Barn Arkansas Calhoun County 1930 structure now houses county memorabilia NA Agriculture NA NA 233 Arkansas Oil and Brine Museum Arkansas Union County, near Smackover Museum tells story of 1920s oil boom in south Arkansas, gives a comprehensive look at history of the industry.
actual rigs and equipment, original fields State Working People; Resource Extraction NA Well-defined programs; complete menu of interpretive displays Derricks, pumps, and jacks are part of a visual working display.
234 Parker Pioneer Homestead, Arkansas Poinsett County, Harrisburg Displays include log cabin, broom shop, chapel, covered wagon, grist mill, and sorghum mill and pit; demonstrations of sorghum making and lye soap making.
NA Working People; Agriculture NA NA 235 Arkansas State University Museum Arkansas Craighead County, Jonesboro Museum with 100 exhibits covering prehistory to present State Cultural Diversity: Native Americans; Agriculture; Mississippi River, History NA Arkansas State University at Jonesboro has best collective interpretation on the Delta in Arkansas through the museum and a number of professors.
NA 236 Museum Lepanto USA Arkansas Poinsett County, Lepanto Delta history exhibits Public Cultural Diversity; Mississippi River NA NA 237 Hampson Museum Arkansas Mississippi County, Wilson, Collection of artifacts from the Nodena site, Late Mississippi period culture State Native American NA Excellent visitor services Interest in archeology of local Dr. James K. Hampson led to this collection, drawing directly from the Nodena site.
238 Delta cultural center Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Detailed look at Delta life and times, housed in a 1912 train depot (donated by Union Pacific).
Focus on agriculture, the river, the people, and the blues.
NA Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: music, family; Working People; Mississippi River; Agriculture; cotton-related experience, timber Helena Very user-friendly; well-developed history of the Delta.
Tells a coherent, but varied story.
Helena helped several Arkansas country singers develop their roots in the blues.
Conway Twitty, Johnny Cash, and Charlie Rich all have ties to the area and are Arkansas natives.
239 Marianna / Lee County Museum Arkansas Lee County, Marianna, Exhibits include general store, parlor, kitchen, cotton; also Civil War and World War II artifacts.
Public Working People, Civil War, cotton experience, Agriculture NA NA 240 W. G. Huxtable pumping plant Arkansas Lee County, Marianna Largest of its kind in the world NA NA NA NA 241 Parkin Archeological State Park Arkansas Cross County, Parkin Archeological study of a Mississippi period Indian village, 1350-1550 State Native Americans NA Onsite interpretive services, research station, programs Some scholars believe this to be the village of Casqui, which De Soto visited in 1541.
242 St. Francis County Museum Arkansas St. Francis County; Forrest City Native American and Civil War artifacts, local history NA Native Americans; Civil War NA NA 243 O. Demoret and Son General Mercantile Store and Museum Arkansas Phillips County; Elaine NA NA NA 244 Louisiana Purchase State Park Arkansas Phillips County; Marvell Monument marks the historic 1815 survey starting point in what was to become Arkansas NA Early Exploration; Colonial History NA Good services, but point probably receives little traffic because of remote location.
NA 245 Lephiew Cotton Gin Arkansas Chicot County, Dermott In operation since 1886; open for tours during harvest season Private Cotton-related experience NA Good example of a modern cotton gin NA 246 Rubye and Henry Connerly Museum Arkansas Chicot County, Eudora Historic grocery store; local history artifacts NA Native Americans; Working People; Mississippi River; Agriculture NA Efforts to increase hours and holdings are underway.
NA 247 Lindbergh Marker Arkansas Chicot County, Lake Village Marker indicates where Col. Charles A. Lindbergh made his first night flight over Lake Chicot in 1923.
State Aviation history In lake Chicot state park NA 248 Stuttgart Agricultural Museum Arkansas Arkansas County; Stuttgart Impressive collection of farming implements and displays concerning farm life on the Grand Prairie.
Waterfowl wing; scale representations of community church, school, and firehouse.
NA Cultural Diversity; Agriculture; Building the American Economy Ulm Stuttgart began as a German settlement on the sparsely populated Grand Prairie.
It is now the rice capital of the world.
Amazing story of an aerial stuntman, display of his equipment 249 Herman Davis Memorial Arkansas Mississippi County; Manila Monument to commemor-ate a great WW I hero who served under and drew great praise from Gen. Jack Pershing State World War I NA NA 250 Woman's Progressive Building Arkansas Cross County, Wynne Site is part of a 1936 WPA project.
NA NA NA 251 Turner Neal Museum Arkansas Drew County, Monticello Exhibits on the Arkansas natural history NA Nature NA Unknown NA 252 Fargo Agricultural School Museum Arkansas Monroe County, Fargo Floyd Brown, a Tuskegee graduate, started school in 1919 to give black students a good quality high school education.
NA Cultural Diversity; Education NA Syrian immigrants in area..
253 White River Arkansas Flows from Missouri through Arkansas and empties into the Mississippi River.
Several historic sites along the river; Native American history, Civil War, and now conservation concerns NA Working People; Cultural Diversity; Native Americans; Natural Resources Batesville, Newport, Des Arc, De Valls Bluff, and Clarendon all began as river ports.
The book The Last River, by Turner Browne, chronicles the lives of people who make a living along the White River and the threat that progress poses to their lives.
254 Houseboat dwellers Arkansas White River, between Des Arc and Clarendon; possibly Black River also.
prairie, Monroe, and Phillips counties A few independent souls still live in the style that once constituted sizable communities.
NA Working People; Expressing Cultural Values NA No markers Percy writes of these folk in Lanterns on the Levee.
255 Pearl Divers Arkansas White River-- Jackson, White, Woodruff, Prairie, and Monroe Counties Pearl divers once sold their finds to local factories, where buttons were made.
Now the small pearls are sold to Japanese companies.
NA Working People; Building the American Economy White River, especially Clarendon, past home of button factories Japanese use the small pearls to fertilize oysters, making their pearls more valuable.
The Last River by Turner Browne contains photographs of pearl divers at work.
Process looks like a cross between movies Deliverance and Waterworld.
256 Civil War Arkansas Camden, Clarendon, Fort Smith, Helena, (more; see "Comments.")
List of names in connection with the war NA Civil War Dougan's Confederate Arkansas Jenkins Ferry, Little Rock, Mansfield, Marks Mills, Osceola, Pea Ridge, Poison Springs, Red River campaign, Wilson's Creek 257 Altus Heritage House Museum Arkansas Franklin County, Altus The original German-American state bank, circa 1800s, with local history and coal mining exhibit NA Cultural Diversity; Building the American Economy; Resource Extraction NA NA 258 Arkansas River visitor center Arkansas Pope County, Russellville (Old Post Road Park) Interpretive exhibit on the development of the river NA Development of Natural Resources; Arkansas River Russellville area NA 259 Arkansas and Missouri Railroad Arkansas Washington County, Springdale, Restored railroad crosses 1882 Winslow tunnel, restored tresses, and the Boston Mountains on a scenic ride.
NA Developing the American Economy; Working People Van Buren and Springdale areas NA 260 Council Oak, Council Oaks City Park Arkansas Yell County, Dardanelle Massive 400 to 500-year-old white oak tree where in 1820 a Cherokee chief signed a treaty giving all land south of the Arkansas River to the territory.
NA Native Americans NA Seemingly fitting connection between the tree and the treaty signing.
The tree is a throwback to another time that has survived the invasion, as the Cherokee did not.
261 Crawford County Courthouse Arkansas Crawford County, Van Buren The oldest active courthouse west of the Mississippi River; still has the original Seth Thomas clock.
NA Architecture Van Buren NA 262 Mount Olive United Methodist Church Arkansas Crawford County, Van Buren This church, built in 1889, is said to hold the oldest black congregation in the United Methodist system west of the Mississippi.
NA Spirituality; Cultural Diversity Van Buren NA 263 Ozark Heritage Crafts Arkansas Pope County, north of Russellville Features handmade items of over 200 crafters.
Woodcarving shop has demonstrations.
NA Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: crafts Area is rich in Ozark culture Hands-on demonstrations offered The area along the Arkansas River Valley from Fort Smith to Little Rock is one of the fastest-growing sections of Arkansas.
The region is moving ahead economically and maintains a sense of heritage.
264 Indian Paintbrush Gallery Arkansas Benton County, Siloam Springs Gallery of Native American paintings, weavings, pottery NA Cultural Diversity: Native Americans NA NA 265 Thorncrown Chapel Arkansas Carroll County, Eureka Springs Chapel designed by E. Fay Jones, a Frank Lloyd Wright student.
Liberal use of glass incorporates the surroundings into the work.
Breathtaking.
NA Architecture NA NA 266 Blythe's Museum Arkansas Scott County, Waldron, Museum contains a collection of Native American artifacts and local history exhibits.
Private Local history; Native Americans, NA Nonprofit exhibits may not be as user-friendly as possible.
Some development would be helpful and probably would be welcomed.
Museum is in the second floor of a brake and front-end shop; both are owned by the same man.
The collections are a result of a lifelong hobby.
267 Cowie Wine Cellars Arkansas Logan County, Paris A family-owned and operated winery Private Building the American Economy; Expressing Cultural Values: food and drink NA Tour includes a history of the family and winemaking.
NA 268 DeGray Lake and Dam Arkansas Clark County, between Hot Springs and Arkadelphia 13,800-acre lake with state park, popular for fishing, camping, swimming, skiing, and diving.
Dam built in late 1970s amid a fierce debate over the environmental impact.
Public, with private holdings near lake People versus Nature DeGray Lake and dam are between Arkadelphia and Hot Springs.
Private lodge; federal campgrounds; resort Only recently has the Corps of Engineers begun to talk candidly about the ecological debate and some unpopular decisions surrounding the construction of the dam.
269 Wolf House Memorial Arkansas Baxter County, Norfork 1820s "dogtrot" cabin.
Museum features local history, including mementos of builder Maj. Jacob Wolf.
NA Vernacular Architecture; Cultural Diversity; local history.
NA Cabin at one time was the courthouse and county seat.
Museum includes mementos of builder Maj. Jacob Wolf, a German pioneer.
270 Arkansas House of Reptiles Arkansas Garland County, Hot Springs Exhibit features 67 rare exhibits from 6 continents Private Natural Resources Store co-owner also owns Rocky's Corner, an Italian restaurant across from Oaklawn racetrack.
Store is run by an expert on reptiles; seems to be a first-class operation.
Reptile house is more impressive than most zoos.
Mr. Diorio has been collecting snakes and other reptiles for years, searching in some areas that require very exclusive permits.
271 Arkansas Symphony Gala Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock Arkansas Symphony Orchestra performed with Bernadette Peters February 21, 1997 NA Expressing Cultural Values: music Robinson Center Music Hall in downtown Little Rock is just a few blocks from the Old Statehouse and Quapaw Quarters.
Arkansas Symphony Orchestra handles its own promotion, 272 Toltec Mounds State Park Arkansas Lonoke County, Scott, Claims are made that this is "one of the largest Mound Builders sites remaining in the Lower Mississippi River Valley."
Public Native Americans NA Guided tours available NA 273 Hot Springs Mountain Tower Arkansas Garland County, Hot Springs A 216-foot observation tower with indoor and outdoor viewing decks offering a spectacular overlook of the historic district and most of Hot Springs.
Private NA Historic district of Hot Springs Open to the public for a cost of about $5.
Focus is on gift shop rather than history.
Incredible views of foliage in autumn.
274 Wagon Yard Museum Arkansas Lonoke County, England Collection of early wagons, stagecoaches, and farm equipment NA Working People; Agriculture NA NA 275 The Witness Arkansas Garland County, Hot Springs Contemporary Christian musical drama at Mid-America Amphitheater Private Spirituality; Expressing Cultural Values: music, performing arts NA NA 276 Crater of Diamonds State Park Arkansas Pike County, Murfreesboro The only diamond-bearing field in North America that is open to the public State Building the American Economy; Resource Extraction NA Several exhibits, gift shop, and recreational areas NA 277 King Biscuit Blues Festival Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Four-day festival featuring a variety of music, as well as food, arts, crafts, and photography NA Expressing Cultural Values: gospel music, blues; Recreation: festivals Festival is closely tied to the Delta Cultural Center in Helena.
Well publicized in the immediate region, but may be relatively unknown in areas without radio stations devoted to blues music; history of the music is possibly underrepresented.
Helena puts a lot of effort into showcasing the area, using King Biscuit as a spokespiece.
278 Mena Depot Center Arkansas Polk County, Mena Local history museum and art gallery housed in a restored train depot NA Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: art NA NA 279 Murray's Dinner Playhouse Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Contemporary musical comedy along with a buffet dinner Private Expressing Cultural Values: music, drama; Recreation NA Charter member of National Dinner Theatre Association.
280 National Cemetery Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Cemetery established in 1866.
NA Military History; Civil War, other wars.
Little Rock Cemetery contains remains of more than 22,000 veterans from Civil War through Desert Storm.
281 Jacksonport State Park Arkansas Jackson County, Jacksonport Park surrounding 1869 courthouse salutes Jacksonport, a thriving riverport town in the 1800s.
Reconstructed riverboat on site.
State Civil War; Building the American Economy: steamboats NA Campsites, picnic sites Town was occupied by Confederate and Union forces during the Civil War because of its strategic location.
Made strong by steamboats, it began to decline in the 1870s when bypassed by the railroad..
282 Prairie County Museum Arkansas Prairie County, Des Arc, Exhibits on early Arkansas settlement, transportation routes, river-based econ-omy, including fishing and shelling.
A Civil War exhibit focuses on river's role in the war.
State Civil War; Working People, NA The interpretation of Arkansas's rivers focuses on the White River.
283 Old Washington Historic State Park Arkansas Hempstead County, Washington (near Hope) A 19th century restoration town, includes 36 sites, including homes, churches, cemeteries, a tavern, a jail, museums, a cotton gin, and a re-created blacksmith shop.
NA Civil War, Architecture, Working People The state park also has world's only bladesmithing school.
The tradition began with the well-known Bowie knife at this site.
The town, established in 1824, was an important stop for people traveling to Texas, and it was the Confederate Capital of Arkansas 1863-1865.
NA 284 Jenkins' Ferry, Arkansas Grant County, south of Sheridan Civil War battlefield, part of the Red River campaign; battle occurred on April 29-30, 1864.
Public Civil War Red River campaign included Poison Spring and Marks' Mill.
NA 285 Old Davidsonville State Park Arkansas Lawrence County, Pocahontas Established in 1815, Davidsonville had first post office, courthouse, and land office in the Arkansas territory.
Public Early Settlement; Working People NA Campsites, picnic areas, fishing Town faded in the 1830s.
286 Ozark Folk Center Arkansas Stone County, north of Mountain View Artisans demonstrate homestead skills and crafts, Sunday gospel concerts, live entertainment (pre-1940s musical performances), and craft fairs.
Public Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: folk art, drama, music NA Sunday gospel concerts, live entertainment six nights a week, restaurants, lodge Cabin crafts" offered in 22 living history exhibits demonstrating barrelmaking, broom making, blacksmithing, etc. in summer and fall; gift shop features homemade furniture, toys, and food.
287 Powhatan Courthouse State Park Arkansas Lawrence County, Powhatan Courthouse, built in 1888 from bricks made onsite, features delicate woodwork and a classic Victorian cupola; jail was constructed of limestone.
This state park features restored courthouse, jail, and a museum on early exploration.
NA Vernacular Architecture; Early Settlement NA Powhatan was a busy riverport town in mid-1800s, site of a famous ferry.
Today the courthouse serves as archives for some of the oldest records in Arkansas.
288 Prairie Grove Battlefield State Park Arkansas Washington County, Prairie Grove Civil War battlefield in the Ozarks.
Museum emphasizes life of a Civil War soldier.
Buildings resemble 19th century hill community.
Public Civil War NA Exhibits and interpretive programs depict Civil War period and its impact on Arkansas.
289 Lake Chicot State Park Arkansas Chicot County, Lake Village, Most events at this state park feature birds or fishing.
Civil War Weekend is in October.
Public Civil War Civil War reenactment of the battle at Ditch Bayou.
NA 290 Town of Fordyce Arkansas Dallas County, Fordyce Town founded by Civil War Col. Samuel Fordyce; home to WW II Adm. John H. Thach, naval aviator and inventor of the "Thach Weave"; Birthplace of Coach Paul "Bear" Bryant; Public Civil War; World War II; Aviation; Expressing Cultural Values: sports Dallas County Museum is in Fordyce Home of world's first southern pine plywood mill, Georgia-Pacific Corp.
First direct-dial long distance telephone call in U.S. was made from Allied Telephone Company in Fordyce in 1960.
First AME church started in Holly Springs by Robert Singleton.
291 Arkansas Territorial Restoration.
Annual May festival Arkansas Pulaski County, Little Rock, Living history reenactments on Mother's Day weekend festival.
ATR has an African-American Living History Troupe that sings and performs.
NA Civil War, Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: music On grounds of Arkansas Territorial Restoration NA 292 Town of Helena Arkansas Phillips County, Helena Site of Civil War battle in July 1863 NA Civil War NA NA NA 293 De Valls Bluff Arkansas Monroe County; De Valls Bluff Site of federal garrisons during Civil War NA Civil War NA NA 294 St. Charles Arkansas NA Site of Civil War battle NA Civil War NA NA 295 Elaine Arkansas Phillips County, Elaine Site of 1919 race riot in response to efforts by the Progressive Farmers and Household Union, which asked for higher prices for cotton grown by black tenant farmers.
NA Working People; Cultural Diversity NA NA 296 Ulm Arkansas Prairie County, Ulm Modern town that began as a German settlement when war veterans claimed land on the Grand Prairie NA Cultural Diversity; Early Settlement Stuttgart NA 297 Towns of Hicks and Barton Arkansas Phillips County, Hicks and Barton Two towns heavily populated by Swiss immigrants who settled on railroad land in late 19th century.
NA Cultural Diversity; Early Settlement NA NA 298 Arkansas Railroad Museum Arkansas Jefferson County, Pine Bluff Museum with railroad memorabilia, including passenger and freight cars and Engine 819.
NA Building the American Economy: railroads; Working People NA NA 299 Bradley County Historical Museum Arkansas Bradley County, Warren Building housing museum is on the National Register of Historic Places; museum tells local history.
NA Local history NA NA 300 Drew County Historical Museum Arkansas Drew County, Monticello, House built in 1909 contains artifacts and antiques; two 1800s log cabins also on the site.
NA Vernacular Architecture; Early Settlement NA NA 301 Grant County Museum / Heritage Village Arkansas Grant County; Sheridan Collection of restored buildings houses artifacts related to local history NA Local History; Early Settlement NA NA 302 Keepers of the Spirit / Persistence of the Spirit Arkansas Jefferson County, Pine Bluff Display chronicles history of black Arkansans and of University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff.
NA NA NA Display can be seen by appointment University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff display chronicles history of black Arkansans and of UAPB. 303 McCollum-Chichester House Arkansas Ouachita County, Camden, Historic home, now a museum, was a stagecoach depot through Civil War; house still sports bullet holes from a Civil War battle NA Civil War NA NA 304 Nevada County Depot museum Arkansas Nevada County, Prescott, Old-fashioned railroad depot NA Building the American Economy: railroads NA NA 305 Pine Bluff / Jefferson County Historical Museum Arkansas Jefferson County, Pine Bluff History of city, county, railroads, and especially lumber NA Building the American Economy: railroads; Resource Extraction NA NA 306 Pioneer Village Arkansas Cleveland County, Rison Re-created 19th century village with blacksmith shop and log cabins NA Vernacular Architecture; Early Settlement; Working People NA NA 307 Sevier County Museum Arkansas Sevier County, De Queen County history, plus tours of 1840 home at the site of Paraclifta, once a thriving town NA NA NA NA 308 Wiggins cabin / Old company house Arkansas Ashley County, Crossett Log cabin and shotgun mill house in Crossett city park NA Working People NA NA 309 Town of Marked Tree Arkansas Poinsett County, Marked Tree Town began in 1881 as a construction camp.
A blazed oak tree marked a ford and portage point at confluence of St. Francis and Little Rivers.
NA Working People NA The town has the world's three largest siphons.
310 Meador's Drug Store; Desha County Museum Arkansas Desha County, Dumas 1940s style lunch counter still serving Private Working People NA NA 311 Felsenthal National Wildlife Refuge Arkansas Union County, west of Crossett 65,000 acres for fishing, hunting, and wildlife observation, especially bird life U.S. government Natural Resources NA NA 312 Mississippi County Historical Center Arkansas Mississippi County, Osceola Historical center occupies a building that was a mercantile store for 86 years.
NA Building the American Economy; Expressing Cultural Values: literature Town is called Plum Point in some of Mark Twain's stories.
Fred Patterson had the first store built in 1901.
His son continued the business after his death in 1964.
313 Old Davidsonville State Park Arkansas Randolph County Davidsonville was site of the state's first courthouse, post office, and land office.
(Also see "Comments."} State History; Early Settlement; Peopling Places NA Town was the seat of Lawrence County in 1815, while Arkansas was still a territory.
It flourished through travel along the Black River and an old military road between Saint Louis and Texas.
314 Pearogue School Hollow Arkansas Izard County, north of Boswell 1915 wooden school building NA Vernacular architecture NA School is not a typical white-washed rectangular building, but looks like a modern art project; trim is elaborate and pronounced, rather like an oriental pagoda.
The school is set in the middle of the woods, creating an interesting contrast.
315 Pea Ridge National Military Park Arkansas Benton County, Pea Ridge Civil War battlefield U.S. government Civil War NA Onsite services, tours Pea Ridge was a key battle in deciding the fate of Missouri.
Saint Louis housed important arsenals.
316 Petit Jean State Park Arkansas Conway County, southwest of Morrilton State park features a mountain overlook and a 95-foot waterfall.
Most facilities were built by the CCC.
State Natural Resources NA 'Petit Jean Mountain lies between the Ouachita and Ozark mountains.
317 Lum 'n' Abner Museum Arkansas Montgomery County; Pine Ridge Collection of memorabilia concerning the careers of principals of a popular 1930s radio show, which starred two local men in a nationwide radio program based on the region.
NA Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: radio entertainment NA Town changed its name in 1936 to match the fictional title "Pine Ridge" to capitalize on public interest in the show.
318 White River Railway Arkansas Marion County, Flippin Vintage train gives train trips along White River.
NA Building the American Economy: railroads; Recreation Train stops at Cotter Access, Buffalo City, Norfork, and Calico Rock.
Train makes two round trips per day.
NA 319 Queen Wilhelmina State Park Arkansas Polk County, northwest of Mena Mountain lodge built in 1898 by railroad investors to honor of the queen of Holland State History NA NA 320 Janssen Park Arkansas Polk County, Mena Park has 2 mountain howitzer cannons, one used in the Civil War, the other in the Mexican War.
1851 log cabin, area's first homesite.
NA Military History; Vernacular Architecture NA Cabin has been a hospital, a post office, an inn, a city hall, and allegedly a hideout for Jesse James.
321 Wal-Mart Visitor Center Arkansas Benton County, Bentonville Sam Walton's first variety store opened in 1945.
NA Building the America Economy NA Wal-Mart is now the largest retailer in the United States.
322 Town of Deer Arkansas Newton County, Deer Near Cherokee settlements along the 1820s and 1830s Trail of Tears.
NA Native Americans NA Unknown Sequoyah is said to have stayed at Deer while developing the written version of the Cherokee language.
323 Searcy County Museum Arkansas Searcy County, Marshall Displays of 19th century farm implements, Civil War memorabilia Public Civil War, Agriculture NA NA 324 Van Buren County Museum Arkansas Van Buren County, Clinton Museum features local history, including displays on rural medicine, war, agriculture, and early history NA Military history; Agriculture; Early Settlement NA NA 325 Cummins Prison, Varner Arkansas Lincoln County, Varner Varner housed the barracks for Cummins Prison, an inmate farm.
NA Cultural Diversity NA The prison was a target of reform for the first 60 years of this century.
326 Scott Joplin mural Arkansas Miller County, Texarkana Mural 20' x 140' depicting life and compositions of famous ragtime composer Scott Joplin NA Expressing Cultural Values: music NA One of Joplin's compositions was "The Entertainer."
327 Town of Piggot Arkansas Clay County, Piggot Town hosted Ernest Hemingway while he worked on A Farewell to Arms.
Hemingway married a local woman.
NA Expressing Cultural Values: literature, movies NA Hemingway's studio is now privately owned, not open to public.
Piggott was also the site of movie, A Face in the Crowd, starring Andy Griffith.
Piggott was established as a railroad town.
328 Town of Gregory Arkansas Woodruff County, Gregory Possible home of Confederate raider Quantrill.
One L. J. Crocker settled here in 1867, lived until 1917.
(see "Comments.")
NA Civil War NA Local legend says Crocker was Quantrill, and he never denied the rumor.
Crocker, saying he came from Georgia, arrived with nothing but a horse and a good deal of money.
He bought a large farm.
Several local people said he was Quantrill, whom he resembled.
329 Battle of Cotton Plant Arkansas Woodruff County, Cotton Plant Site of Civil War battle on July 7, 1862.
(Woodruff County is named after founder of state's oldest newspaper.
NA Civil War; Early history NA Another battle took place in Woodruff County April 1, 1864, at Fitzhugh's woods north of Augusta.
Many stores still bear iron plates of immigrant founders.
330 Buffalo River Rafting Arkansas Marion County A man named Walter Isom, who died in 1969, made a living rafting timber down the Buffalo and White Rivers.
NA Working People NA Walter Isom was one of the county's last raftsmen.
Buffalo River is now Buffalo National River.
331 Home of "Aunt Caroline" Dye Arkansas Jackson County, Newport Aunt Caroline" was a well-known black fortune teller / clairvoyant who lived in Newport in the early 1900s.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; 'ethnicity, vernacular NA There is some interest in erecting a marker or opening the house.
Aunt Caroline" is mentioned in W. C. Handy's "Sundown Blues."
332 Blackville Arkansas Jackson County, Blackville Town settled by 53 black families in wake of Civil War. former slave named Pickens Black owned 6,000 acres and started town after the Civil War NA Cultural Diversity; local history NA No Blackville families accepted relief during the Great Depression 333 Jamestown Arkansas Independence County, Jamestown Town founded in 1869, was destroyed by fire August 1921.
NA Education; local history NA Town grew to support Arkansas Normal College before entire town destroyed by fire in August 1921.
334 Pfeiffer Stone Company Arkansas Independence County, Batesville Local rock company founded in 1903 by German immigrant Fritz Krueger.
Private Cultural Diversity; Building the American Economy NA Unknown NA 335 Kingsland Arkansas Cleveland County, Kingsland Hometown of country music legend Johnny Cash and football coach Bear Bryant NA Expressing Cultural Values: music; Recreation, sports NA This town of about 300 people does not capitalize on its amazing hometown sons.
336 Sunnyside Plantation on Lake Chicot Arkansas Chicot County, Sunnyside Plantation Antebellum plantation that became infamous in 1900s through abuse of Italian immigrants NA Working People; Cultural Diversity; Agriculture NA Several scholars have published material about the area.
A recent book has been done by Jeannie Whayne of University of Arkansas at Fayetteville.
337 Arkansas Indian Culture Center Arkansas Sharp County, Hardy NA NA Native Americans NA NA 338 Bald Knob Centennial Museum Arkansas White County, Bald Knob NA NA NA NA NA 339 Blytheville Heritage Museum Arkansas Mississippi County, Blytheville, Museum focuses on the legacy of cotton and on local aviation NA Building the American Economy: cotton, steel industry; Aviation NA NA 340 Historic Clover Bend Community Center and Museum Arkansas Randolph County, Black Rock, NA NA NA NA NA 341 Living Farm Museum of the Ozarks Arkansas Randolph County, Pocahontas, NA NA Agriculture NA NA 342 Log Cabin Museum Arkansas Prairie County, Des Arc Re-created "dogtrot" museum NA Vernacular Architecture; Working People NA Time element is somewhat lost, as donated artifacts placed in the display may not correspond to the age of the cabin NA 343 Maynard Pioneer Museum Arkansas Randolph County, Maynard NA NA NA NA 344 Old Independence Regional Museum Arkansas Independence County, Batesville NA NA NA NA 345 Ozark Heritage Arts Center and Museum Arkansas Searcy County, Leslie, Museum of local history, art gallery, and a 400-seat theater in a restored 1938 WPA gymnasium NA Working People; Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts; Building the American Economy Good exhibits suffer from neglect over the years Museum consists of four rooms of artifacts, especially on local businesses 346 South Arkansas Arts Center Arkansas Union County, El Dorado, A 200-seat studio; two art galleries featuring visual arts changing monthly; ballet and music lessons NA Expressing Cultural Values: fine arts, dance, music Well-established program 9 to 5 Mondays through Fridays 347 Trumann Museum Arkansas Poinsett County; Trumann NA NA NA NA 348 Veterans' Military Museum of Hardy Arkansas Sharp County, Hardy Museum concerning military history NA Military history One room, "the motor pool," displays vehicles from World War II to Vietnam.
Another exhibit contains memorabilia from the Civil War through Desert Storm.
349 White County Historical Museum Arkansas White County, Searcy, Log cabin c. 1840; original one-room schoolhouse; rebuilt general store Private Vernacular Architecture; local history NA 350 Mammoth Spring State Park Arkansas Fulton County, Mammoth Spring State's largest spring, 10th largest in world, featuring excellent fishing and floating.
Onsite 1880s railroad museum, and an old powerhouse that was operated by the spring's power.
State Natural Resources; Recreation NA 351 Tennessee River Fresh Water Pearl Farm Tour 
Growing river industry.
Private - aquaculture pearl farm.
Developing the American Economy; resource extraction Tennessee River Folk Life Museum Visitor center and museum Admission charged; Pearl Farm open April through November.
Must call for reservation to take tour.
Pearl Museum open year round.
352 Tennessee River Folklife Museum Tennessee Benton County, Nathan Bedford Forrest State Park Center has collection of documents relating the experience of river people after the development of the Tennessee Valley Authority.
Documents deal with peoples' recovery and adaptation to a new life.
State Transforming the Environment; TVA projects Tennessee River Fresh Water Pearl Farm/Museum Visitor center No admission charge.
Open daily from August to November; center also has library with video and audio collection.
353 Cary's Sorghum Mill Tennessee Camden; Benton County Sorghum production facility.
Works on same principle as mule 
Sorghum products available for purchase.
Private Agriculture; Expressing Cultural Values through foods.
NA None.
People stop from time to time and talk with owners.
Mill harvests sorghum and produces syrup September through mid-October.
Interested persons need to call the mill to place order or to find out when the sorghum is being milled.
Supply of sorghum depends on weather.
354 Patsy Cline Memorial Tennessee Camden; Benton County Benton County is the site of the plane crash that claimed the lives of Patsy Cline and members of her band.
City Expressing Cultural Values; Music NA Chamber of Commerce, Benton County Visitors need to call Benton County Chamber of Commerce to confirm date of event.
355 Johnsonville Reenactment Tennessee Benton County, Nathan Bedford Forrest State Park Civil War reenactment commemorating Forrest's loss at Pilot's Knob, a river fortification.
State Civil War; Expressing Cultural Values National BattlefField State Park Visitor Center Event is held in October.
356 T. J. Whitfield's Braille Boat Tennessee Benton County, Nathan Bedford Forrest State Park Whitfield was a local river fisherman.
The Braille boat was equipped with hooks used to harvest mussels.
State River life; Transportation Nathan Bedford Forrest State Park Visitor Center Center contains many audio and video recordings depicting the life of the people who made their homes and livings on the river.
357 Maggie Lee Sayre Photograph Collection at the Tennessee River Folklife Museum Tennessee Benton Co.
Maggie Lee Sayre grew up on a shanty boat in the river.
She recorded her life through a black and white camera.
The images are a great record of river life.
Tennessee River Folklife Museum Tennessee River; Expressing Cultural Values; People of the Delta Nathan Bedford Forrest State Park Visitor Center Maggie Lee Sayre is deaf and unable to speak, a great resource for folklife interpretation.
358 Thornton's Trading Post Tennessee Benton County Trading post similar to a turn-of-the century mercantile.
Specializes in horseware and has Amish and antique carriages on display.
Private Cultural Diversity; Transportation Other Benton County sites Retail facility Area at one time had an Amish community, but it no longer exists.
Thornton has a manu-facturing facility to produce his own tack.
359 Oak Hill Cemetery Tennessee Huntingdon; Carroll County, Burial site of Gov. Gordon Browning City State Politics; Public Education Gordon Weaver Browning Museum, Mckenzie Museum, or may use Carroll County Chamber of Commerce NA 360 Gordon Weaver Browning Museum/ Carroll County Historical Society Tennessee McKenzie; Carroll County Museum contains Browning memorabilia and genealogical resources.
Private State Politics; Public Education; Expressing Cultural Values Oak Hill Cemetery Museum Brownig's major political contribution was to the public education system of TN; Served in both world wars; Gubernatorial terms were in the 30's and 50's .
361 "The world's largest coon hunt" Tennessee Parsons; Decatur County An annual event held to raise money for St. Jude's hospital.
Participants tree the coons but do not kill them.
The hunt is based on a point system.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; Recreation NA May use Decatur County Chamber of Commerce This is a large event for the town of Parsons that has helped raise $1,000,000 for St. Jude's.The organization is rebuilding facilities destroyed in a 1995 fire.
362 B 
Market is a point of processing, shipping, and retailing.
Private Developing the American Economy, Resource Extraction; Expressing Cultural Values; Fishing as an Industry NA Employees take time to talk with tourists; the site is accustomed to having visitors.
Parsons is a town of 2,000 situ-ated on the Tenn.
River.
Fishing is a significant industry.
Local river catfish business threatened by catfish farming.
363 Ferry Boat Tennessee Parsons; Decatur County Ferry boat has up to 6- car capacity and presents a chance to experience an antiquated form of transportation.
Private Transportation; Man vs. Nature "World's Largest Coon Hunt" May use Decatur County Chamber of Commerce Group is currently rebuilding facilities.
364 Dr. Walter E. David Wildlife Museum Tennessee Dyer County Dyersburg State Community College, Glover Building Collection of every specimen of duck found in Mississippi flyway State Mississippi river 
365 K 
Owner makes his own root beer and offers barbecue, corn dogs, and other short order items.
Still has carhops.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; food NA Restaurant Has a 30-year plus history.
366 T. G. Shepherd Boyhood Home Tennessee Humboldt; Gibson County Shepherd is a country music celebrity.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; music NA Humboldt museum.
Visitors may see town that shaped Shepherd's early life.
NA 367 Strawberry Festival - Historical museum Tennessee Humboldt; Gibson County Collection of local memorabilia, exhibits on town development, evolution of telephone, collection/exhibit relating to W.W. II Brig. Gen. Claude Adams.
City Southern Town Development; Espressing Cultural Values; festivals; military; agriculture NA Self-guided NA 368 University of Tennessee - West TN Agriculture Museum Tennessee Milan, Gibson County Museum interprets the agriculture community from 1850-1950.
State Developing the American Economy; agriculture Carroll County Browning Museum and Oak Hill Cemetery Site offers guided tours.
Facilities include a frontier, agri-cultural community (church, schoolhouse, blacksmith, private homes, etc.) horsedrawn agricul-tural equipment and birthplace of Governor Browning.
369 Davy Crockett Cabin Tennessee Rutherford; Gibson County Reproduction of cabin incorporating some of the original timbers Private Peopling Places; Folk Heroes Burial site of John Wesley Crockett, son of Davy Cabin is museum Cabin is a reproduction, including timbers from Crockett's last Tennessee home.
His mother is buried on the grounds.
370 City of Rutherford Tennessee Gibson County City hosts Davy Crockett Days annually on the first of October.
City Expressing Cultural Values;- music; festivals; storytelling; frontier settlement Davy Crockett Cabin Gibson County Chamber of Commerce Festival began in 1968 as a Rutherford Centennial cele-bration.The event includes pioneer trade craft demonstra-tions, old-time string band music, and tall tale contests.
371 Ames Plantation Tennessee Grand Junction; Hardeman County Plantation hosts the National Field Dog Trial Championships for bird dogs.
Private Recreation; Expressing Cultural Values National Bird Dog Hall of Fame Plantation is open for tours on the 4th Thurs-day from March through October, other times by appointment.
NA 372 National Bird Dog Museum 
Private Expressing Cultural Values; recreation Ames Plantation Tour of exhibits NA 373 The Little Courthouse Tennessee Bolivar; Hardeman County Log courthouse built in 1824 served as first courthouse of Hardeman County.
In 1827 it became a private home and was remodeled.
One of the few surviving examples of log courthouse structures.
Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities The Pillars NA Chamber of Commerce of Hardeman County Open by appointment; can call Hardeman County Chamber of Commerce.
374 The Pillars Tennessee Bolivar; Hardeman County Construction dates to 1826.
Maj. John Houston Bills purchased it in 1831.
One of the original settlers of west Tennessee, Bills was a member of a group that surveyed and estab-lished the territory.The Borders house is being restored.
Association for the Preservation of Tennessee Antiquities Peopling Places; effects of exploration and settlement; Architecture The Little Register Chamber of Commerce Visitation is by appointment; must contact Hardeman County Chamber of Commerce.
House is also associated with Sam Houston, President James K. Polk, and other prominent 19th century politicians 375 Tennessee River Waterway Museum Tennessee Harden County Museum's collection centers on Tennessee River being used for power generation.
Federal Transforming the Environment; TVA projects NA Self-guided tour.
Pickwick Dam is part of TVA.
These projects had major effects on the land use and people of this area.
Museum and tours are free.
376 Nutbush/Tina Turner Heritage Resource Center Tennessee Brownsville; Haywood County Center has a collection of video and audio record-ings of Ike 
Private Expressing Cultural Values; music Nutbush Tina Turner Tour Resource center serves as visitor center.
To schedule a visit to center or find out date of festival, can call 901-772-4265 or 901-772-8157.
377 Tina Turner childhood home tour Tennessee Nutbush; Haywood County Various sites associated with the childhood of Tina Turner, music celebrity Private Expressing Cultural Values; music Tina Turner Resource Center Resource Center A building is being refurbished to display an exhibit on Tina Turner.
Although house is no longer standing, one may gain a sense of Tina Turner's childhood experiences and influences.
378 Lincoln Museum/ Haywood County Museum Tennessee Brownsville; Haywood County County museum covering the history of the area and the people; also has collection of Abraham Lincoln memorabilia.
City Expressing Cultural Values; Civil War NA Museum Collection contains photos of community, war memorabilia, agricultural tools, etc.
379 Battle of Parker's Crossroads Tennessee Parker's Crossroads; Henderson County Self-guided tour of battle area.
Tour consists of seven markers with text describing battle.
NA Civil War NA Cotton Patch Restaurant serves as information center 
NA 380 Paris, TN Tennessee Henry County on Tennessee River Town hosts the "World's Largest Fish Fry" City Expressing Cultural Values; food (catfish) Kentucky Lake, Old City Cemetery Chamber of Commerce In last week of April, town hosts event including parade, catfish races, rodeo, etc.
381 Old City Cemetery Tennessee Paris; Henry County Cemetery is burial site of John Dewitt Clinton Atkins.
Atkins was Ten-nessee's delegate to the Confederate Provisional Congress and also its representative in the Confederate Congress.
City Civil War NA Paris/ Henry County Chamber of Commerce NA 382 Old City Cemetery Tennessee Paris; Henry County Burial site of John Wesley Crockett, son of David "Davy" Crockett City Folk legends of the South Davy Crockett Cabin in Rutherford Paris/Henry County Chamber of Commerce NA 383 Reelfoot Lake State Park Museum Tennessee Tiptonville, Lake County Museum exhibits aspects of natural and cultural change in area.
State Transforming the Environment; natural activity; human interaction Calhoun Boatworks Interpretive Center Interpretive focus is on natural and cultural changes of lake and people.
Natural focus:-1811-12 new Madrid earthquake, siltation problems.
Cultural focus: commercialization of hunting and fishing 384 Reelfoot Lake State Park Tennessee Tiptonville; Lake County Lake, created by the 1811-12 earthquake, is Tennessee's only natural lake.
State Transforming the Environment; New Madrid earthquake of 1811-12; Recreation NA Visitor center at museum Reelfoot lake is the winter home for ducks and geese.
Park also boasts an American eagle population.
385 Calhoun Boatworks Tennessee Tiptonville; Lake County, across from Reelfoot lake State Park Builds Reelfoot Stump Jumper; a type of boat used on Reelfoot lake Private Transportation Reelfoot Lake State Park Boat works welcomes visitors, who can also use visitor center at Park.
Calhoun's work has been exhibited at Smithsonian Institution and at the 1982 world's fair in Knoxville, TN. 386 Saltillo Historic District and Ferry Tennessee Saltillo; Hardin County One of a few remaining river ferries, Saltillo is an early river town dating to circa 1840.
Town has examples of farmhouses, Greek revival and Italianate architecture.
NA Transforming the environment; Transportation; Architecture NA Harden County Chamber of Commerce Fee is charged for ferry transportation.
387 Tennessee River Museum Tennessee Savannah; Harden County City museum housing collections of local history City The River; Man against Nature, Developing the American Economy; Transportation; Expressing Cultural Values; music NA Collection has resources on Indian culture, early river society, freshwater mussel harvesting, Civil War.
NA 388 Cherry Mansion Tennessee Savannah; Hardin County 1830s house built on former Indian mound.
Queenie Haley, grand-mother of Alex Haley, worked here near turn of the century.
Private Architecture, Southern Literary Figures and Influences City Cemetery; Alex Haley house in Henning, TN Grounds are open to public; building is not open for tours.
House, its inhabitants, and surroundings inspired American writer Alex Haley.
389 Catfish Capital of the World Tennessee Savannah; Hardin County, on the Tennessee River River Town that is rich with fishing opportunities.
The town's big draw is catfish.
City Expressing Cultural Values; food, music, festivals, and pageants.
Tennessee River Museum city visitors center City hosts large tournament, catfish 
390 City Cemetery Tennessee Savannah; Hardin County Cemetery for the town of Savannah.
Burial sirte of Alex Haley, Sr., and Queenie Haley, grand-parents of author Alex Haley.
City Expressing Cultural Values -literature and storytelling Cherry Mansion, Alex Haley House City Visitor Center City Cemetery is burial site of Hank Deberry, Brooklyn Dodgers catcher, and Elizabeth Patterson, baby-sitter on the "I love Lucy" show.
These people grew up in Hardin County.
Unfortunately, their childhood houses are not standing.
391 Red Sulphur Bed 
Private Civil War; Vernacular Architecture; folk figures Hardin County sites Bed/breakfast.
Can call County Chamber of Commerce for phone number.
Served as an early health spa because of the abundance of sulphur springs.
Hideout spot for Frank 
Was used as a hospital in the Civil War and as lodging facilities during the Battle of Shiloh.
392 Harbor-Pitts Company Tennessee Savannah; Hardin County 1910 general store built on the banks of the Tennessee River is still in operation.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; Literature and Storytelling; Recreation Hardin County sites Store serves as center Owners host storytelling nights.
Can call to inquire if any events are scheduled.
393 Henning - Jim Hickman's Hometown Tennessee Henning; Lauderdale County Hometown of baseball player Jim Hickman City Recreation, baseball Lauderdale County sites Lauderdale County Chamber of Commerce Can see town in which Hickman grew up, sites associated with his childhood.
394 Alex Haley House Museum Tennessee Henning; Lauderdale County House where Haley lived until his preteen years and then spent summers.
It was here that he heard oral histories of ancestors and African roots, which inspired his novel "Roots."
Private Expressing Cultural Values; Literature and Storytelling Cherry Mansion, City Cemetery of Savannah, Museum NA 395 Ripley, Tennessee Tennessee Lauderdale County Site of the Lauderdale County annual Tomato Festival City Expressing Cultural Values; agriculture Lauderdale Cellars, other Lauderdale County sites Lauderdale County Chamber of Commerce Festival highlights Ripley's agricultural community.
Tomatoes, one of the area's more important crops, are known for their quality.
396 Lauderdale Cellars Tennessee Ripley; Lauderdale County Winery specializing in tomato wine Private Expressing Cultural Values; agriculture NA Gift Shop Lauderdale Cellars produces a unique product in its tomato wine.
It also offers wines made from watermelon, pear, apple and blueberry.
397 John Lee "Sonny Boy" Williamson gravesite Tennessee Jackson; Madison County Cemetery for the Old Blairs Chapel church; John Lee "Sonny Boy" Williamson is buried here Private Expressing Cultural Values; religion, music Tied to Shannon Street in Jackson Madison County Chamber of Commerce NA 398 Rock Temple Church of God in Christ Tennessee Jackson, Madison County Brick church building where blues singer Mabel "Big Maybelle" Smith attended as a child.
Private Expressing Cultural Values John Lee "Sonny Boy" Williamson's gravesite Madison County Chamber of Commerce Building is basically the same structure as when Smith used it.
Some of the area has been cleared for development.
399 Shannon Street, Jackson Tennessee Jackson, Madison County Shannon Street is an integral part of John Lee "Sonny Boy" Williamson's music.
City Expressing Cultural Values; music Sites tied to "Sonny Boy" Williamson and Mabel Smith Madison County Chamber of Commerce Undergoing revitalization.
400 Shannon Street Music Festival Tennessee Jackson, Madison County Festival celebrates Jackson's blues heritage.
City Festivals and blues music Sites tied to "Sonny Boy" Williamson and Mabel Smith Madison County Chamber of Commerce NA 401 Buford Pusser Home 
Movie "Walking Tall" was about Pusser.
402 Flippens Fruit Farm 
Private Peopling Places; Agriculture; Adaptability/Versatility; Expressing Cultural Values; food Reelfoot Lake Site has fruit market, restaurant.
Business is family owned and operated.
Flippens established this business in the 1950s.
Adapted from cotton to fruit.
403 Dixie Gun Works / Old Car Museum Tennessee Union City, Obion County Museum's collection in-cludes antique guns, cars, electrical equipment, and a log cabin ca. 1850s.
Private Developing the American Economy; technology; weaponry; automobile; electricity; Architecture NA Museum Collection begun by owner of Dixie Gun Works.
404 Davies Manor Tennessee Brunswick, Shelby County Two-story log house built before 1807 by Indian chief.
Purchased in 1838 by Davies family and became large plantation.
Davies Manor Association Peopling Places; Expressing Cultural Values; Vernacular Architecture NA NA Working on documenting the history of the house.
House is being reinterpreted to the 1850 period 405 Heritage Railroad 
City Transportation: railroad NA Must call for an appointment to see museum.
NA 406 Burkle Estate / Slavehaven Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County 1849 house used as a stop on Underground Railroad.
House was built by German immigrants.
Private Peopling Places; Civil War; Slavery NA Tour by appointment Must call for reservation to see house 407 Center for Southern Folklore Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Organization documenting the people and traditions of the South Private, nonprofit People of the Delta NA Gift shop Interprets various aspects and people of the Delta and Memphis areas; conducts tours of Beale Street.
408 Charlie Vergo's Rendezvous Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Restaurant specializing in charbroiled ribs begun in 1948 by Greek immigrant; blends Greek and Southern cuisines.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; food NA Restaurant Restaurant is well known in and out of Memphis area.
409 Coletta's Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Italian restaurant established in 1923 serves barbecued pizza.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; food NA Restaurant NA 410 Cotton Row Walking Tour Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Tour consists of 10 sites located between Wagner Place and Monroe Street, downtown Memphis.
Public/Private Agriculture: cotton's impact on the 20th century NA Memphis Visitors Bureau Cotton Row has been the cotton commercial trade center for the central Mississippi Valley.
Most buildings date to the late 19th or early 20th centuries.
411 Crying Angel Cemetery Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Cemetery used by older families of the area.
One grave is marked by an elaborately carved life-sized figure of an angel with swept-back wings and its head bowed in prayer.
Private Cemetery architecture NA Memphis Visitors' Bureau Located in a lonely spot from Millington.
Night visitors have claimed to have seen the angel's wings move in the breeze and tears roll down its cheeks.
412 Daisy Theater Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Building constructed c. 1917 by Sam Zerilla, who built the first movie house for blacks.
It now houses a blues museum.
Private Early 20th century development of black-owned enterprises; blues music Beale Street sites Visitor center located at 340 Beale Street; blues museum tour NA 413 Ducks Unlimited Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Headquarters of Ducks Unlimited, a wetland conservation organization Private The River; Conservation of Habitat and Wildlife NA Can tour facilities, view exhibits of memorabilia and wetlands, ecosystem.
NA 414 Elmwood Cemetery Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Cemetery founded in 1852, a nonprofit venture.
Final resting place of 18 Confederate generals, political figures, and notable citizens of Memphis.
Still in use.
Private Cultural Diversity; Civil War; Southern sense of tragedy; cemetery architecture Other sites in Memphis Visitor center offers guided or self-guided tours.
Cemetery has examples of Victorian period statuary and some ironwork.
Future plans are to turn current office building into a genealogical research facility 415 Elvis Presley driving tour Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Tour of Memphis sites related to Presley's teen years and early recording career Public/Private Cultural Icon - Elvis Presley Ohter Memphis sites Visitor information center NA 416 "The Firm" Walking Tour Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County.
Sites are located in down-town Memphis between Beale and Adams Streets.
Sites were used in the film adaptation of John Grisham's book "The Firm" Public/Private Expressing Cultural Values; Literature, Southern writer NA Visitor information center Tour consists of noted Memphis architectural sites and restaurants.
417 First Baptist Beale Street Church Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County First Memphis church constructed for blacks between 1867-1881 Private Nonresidential Architecture; Spirituality; Reconstruction period; African-Americans NA Visitor information center NA 418 Four Way Grill Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Restaurant specializing in soul food open daily from 7 a.m. to 11 p.m.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; food NA Restaurant NA 419 Frisco Bridge Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Cantilever bridge built in 1892 to bring seven rail lines across the Mississip-pi River; original built by three railroad companies.
NA Transportation; Building the American Economy NA Visitor information center Bridge is considered to be a landmark of American engineering; exhibits America's "taming " of the river and working to expand the economy.
420 Ghost Tour of Memphis Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County NA Public/Private Southern themes: tragedy and melodrama NA Can pick up guide at visitor information center NA 421 Gridley's Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Specializes in "wet" ribs.
These are sticky, messy and glazed with a fruity red sauce.
Also serves barbecued shrimp.
Private Expressing Cultural Values : food NA Restaurant Restaurant makes its own breads and desserts; rivals Rendezvous to be the best in Memphis.
422 Hunt-Phelan house Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Antebellum home was a stop on the Underground Railroad.
Site contains a Freedman's Bureau school.
Private Slavery; Civil War; Reconstruction; Architecture NA Visitor information center NA 423 Leonard's Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Restaurant specializing in barbecue Private Expressing Cultural Diversity; food NA Restaurant Site is well-known in area and is reputed to be quite good.
424 Memphis Belle B-17 Bomber Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County WW II bomber.This was the first U.S. bomber to complete 25 missions against Nazi Germany with no casualties; subject of a movie City Warfare, Weaponry, Aviation NA Visitor information center Months of operation are March-October.
Cannot enter interior of plane.
425 Mississippi River Museum Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County, Mud Island Museum covers the 10,000-year history of Mississippi River.
City People of the Delta; Mississippi River NA Visitor information center NA 426 Mud Island Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Large (52-acre) complex on Mississippi River, containing river walk and other exhibits.
City Mississippi River NA Visitor information center Open March through October 427 Music Driving Tour of Memphis Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Sites important to the Memphis music scene are scattered between Elvis Presley Blvd., Union Street, and Beale Street.
Public/Private Expressing Cultural Values; music NA Center for Southern Folklore, located on Beale St. NA 428 National Civil Rights Museum Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Museum in the motel where Martin Luther King, Jr., was killed has exhibits spanning the American civil rights movement.
Private Race Relations; African American Heritage; Slavery; Civil Rights Movement NA Museum NA 429 National Ornamental Metal Museum Tennessee Shelby County, Memphis, 374 Metal Museum Drive Museum is one of a kind; its mission is to preserve the art and craft of metalworking.
It has a working blacksmith's shop.
Private Building the American Economy; technology of metalworking NA Museum galleries and gift shop.
Changing exhibits that range from jewelry making to architectural metals.
430 The Peabody Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County One of the finest hotels in Memphis; established for over 100 years.
Home of the Peabody ducks, which are on display in the lobby daily.
Private Architecture; Building the American Economy NA Hotel and restaurants Hotel claims that the Delta begins in the lobby 431 St. Mary's Episcopal Church.
Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Oldest Episcopal cathedral in the South, built between 1898 and 1926.
The present structure replaced an 1857 Gothic Revival wooden building.
Private Nonresidential architecture: Spirituality NA Visitor information center NA 432 Sun Studio Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County Recording studio where big-name performers like Elvis Presley started their musical careers.
Private Expressing Cultural Values; music NA Offers tours NA 433 Tri-State Bank Building Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County This building, constructed in 1907, houses the third black-owned bank in Memphis.
Pace 
Private Expressing Cultural Values;-music; Developng the American Economy; development of black-owned businesses.
NA Visitor information center NA 434 Walking tour of downtown churches and public buildings, Memphis Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County.
Sites are located between Adams and Market Streets.
Various styles of architecture are repre-sented.
Buildings are of historical and architectural significance.
Private/Public Cultural Diversity in the Delta; Religion; Nonresidential Architecture NA Visitor information center NA 435 Cobb-Parr Park Tennessee Covington, Tipton County City park where the Tipton barbecue festival is held.
City Expressing Cultural Values: Festivals and food NA Tipton County Chamber of Commerce City of Covington hosts festival, which boasts the world's oldest barbecue cooking contest.
436 Bozo's Barbecue Restaurant Tennessee Mason, Tipton County Barbecue restaurant in operation since 1923 serves chopped or shredded style pork with vinegar-based sauce.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: food NA Resturant Owners were sued by Bozo the Clown for infringement over use of name Bozo; the case made its way to the U.S. supreme court; owners won.
437 Fort Wright Tennessee Tipton and Randolph Counties Fort used in Civil War.
Only remaining powder magazine in Tennessee.
Breastworks still exist.
It was a training facility for Nathan Bedford Forrest's troops.
Public/Private Civil War NA Tipton County Chamber of Commerce NA 438 Ruffin Theater Tennessee Covington, Tipton County Built in July 1937, remod-eled 1941 in the art deco style.
The building retains the art deco motifs in the marquee, courting seats, and swirl patterns on the ceiling, Renovated and restored in the 1980s.
Tipton Fine Arts Council 20th century; nonresidential architecture NA Arrangements for viewing can be made through the Tipton County Chamber of Commerce.
Southern buildings of this style are rare.
439 South Main Historic District, Covington Tennessee Covington, Tipton County; South Main 
Carriage rides are offered.
440 Tennessee Gins Tennessee Covington, Tipton County Cotton gin 
Ginning facility was one of the first in the nation to become automated.
Private Developing the Economy: technology; Agriculture: cotton NA Visitors can tour facility.
Need to call for guided tours.
441 Home of Mike Snider Tennessee Gleason, Weakley County, Town where Grand Ole Opry member Mike Snider grew up and continues to maintain a home.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: country music Town of Gleason City Hall serves as visitor center.
NA 442 Gleason, TN Tennessee Weakley County, extreme NW Tennessee; borders Kentucky Gleason began as a railroad town.
Some historic structures remain along the railroad.
City Developing the American Economy: transportation; railroad company town.
NA City Hall serves as visitor center NA 443 Boyette's Restaurant Tennessee Tiptonville, Lake County Family-owned restaurant that was established in 1921 as a country store.
Specializes in family style meals.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: food Reelfoot Lake State Park Restaurant NA 444 Cranetown Tennessee Tiptonville, Lake County, located within Reelfoot Lake State Park A swampy area of huge cypress trees.
Used as setting for "Raintree County" starring Elizabeth Taylor 
State Expressing Cultural Values: Southern themes in film; man's impact on nature.
NA Visitor center located at museum Area was dynamited for crews to gain entry.
Human traffic negatively affected the wildlife population.
445 Kentucky Lake Tennessee Paris, Henry County One of the largest man-made lakes in the world, created through Tennessee valley authority floods of the 1930s.
Tennessee Valley Authority Mississippi River: TVA projects NA Henry County Chamber of Commerce Lake located in Paris (Henry Co.), TN, the oldest incorporated town in west Tennessee.
Fishing is a major recreational sport in the area.
446 Center of Popular Music, Middle Tennessee State University Tennessee Murfreesboro, Rutherford County Center for research/ scholarship in American popular music, mid-18th century to present State Expressing Cultural Values : music NA Center maintains large library and archive of print materials and sound recordings.
Site is out of the study area but is a wonderful resource for researching and understanding the music of the Delta and America.
447 Fort Pillow State Park Tennessee Henning, Lauderdale County Fort Pillow was one of several river fortifications used by the Confederacy for defense.
The area had river batteries and an extensive system of breastworks.
Controlled by both Confederate and Union forces.
State Civil War NA Interpretive center NA 448 Doug Atkins hometown Tennessee Humboldt, Gibson County Boyhood town of Atkins, figure in the National Football League.
Sites and environment relate to the formative years of Atkins and his football career.
City Recreation: sports NA Humboldt County Chamber of Commerce NA 449 R 
Serves pulled barbecue with tomato- based sauce, as well as catfish.
Private Expressing Cultural Values: food NA Restaurant Restaurant has won several awards.
450 Jack Boone Tennessee Henderson, Chester County Boyhood home of Jack Boone, writer of "Dossie Bell is Dead."
Boone was a southern writer and recipient of the O. Henry award in the 1930s.
City Civil War; Expressing Cultural Values: Southern themes, literature Hurst Nation Historic Marker Chester County Chamber of Commerce or County Library Boone was a poet and writer of short stories, including the published work "Dossie Bell is Dead."
The subject of the book is Col. Fielding Hurst, who formed the Hurst nation.
451 Hurst Nation Historic Marker Tennessee McNairy County, located off hwy. 45 between Bethel Springs and Selmer Hurst nation was an area occupied by union sympathizers and named for the Hurst family.
Main area was part of McNairy 
NA Civil War: Cultural Diversity of the Delta Jack Boone's house in Henderson, TN. McNairy County Library Hurst's wartime home still stands.
It was the only structure spared by Union and Confederate forces.
Hurst was leader of Union outfit in TN.
He lived in the Purdy community.
452 Col. Fielding Hurst gravesite Tennessee McNairy County, Mt. Gilead cemetery Gravesite of Col. Hurst, union officer in Tennessee 6th cavalry Private QUESTION Hurst Nation Historic Marker; Jack Boone's house May use McNairy co. library as center Cemetery dates to 1823.
453 Elvis Presley's Grlfriend's House Tennessee Memphis, Shelby County House purchased by Elvis for girlfriend in 1975.
Decorated by Elvis's interior designer.
It also has original wooden guardhouse from Graceland.
Private Cultural icon: Elvis Presley Graceland, Elvis Presley driving tour Visitor information center.
Can tour Graceland but must see this site from street.
NA 454 Magnolia Place Tennessee Somerville, Fayette County Mansion built in 1911.
NA Residential architecture NA Tours are available and can schedule luncheons.
NA 455 Dorcas Walker House Mississippi Adams County, Natchez Home of Dorcas Walker, one of whose daughters became Mississippi's first African-American social worker.
Built 1899.
Private Cultural Diversity: the African-American experience No visitor services Social worker's father was a Jewish merchant, Charles Moritz.
456 Grand Village of the Natchez Indians Mississippi Adams County, Natchez Location of historic ceremonial mound center for the Natchez Indians.
Site today features a museum, mounds, nature trails, and reconstructed Natchez house.
Private Spirituality; Cultural Diversity: 'Native Americans Wall panels, self-guiding tours; educational programs held regularly.
457 Wagner's Store Mississippi Adams County, Church Hill Country store dating from 1877 has been operated by the Wagners since 1922; also has been run by Jewish merchants.
Private Building the American Economy Church Hill No visitor services Until 1922, the store also was the town post office.
458 Natchez College Mississippi Adams County, Natchez African-American college founded in 1885 by Baptists; operated until the early 1990s.
Private Cultural Diversity; Education; Expressing Cultural Values: literature No visitor services Anne Moody, author of Coming of Age in Mississippi attended Natchez college.
459 Clarence "Bud" Scott House Mississippi Adams County, Natchez Home of well-known jazz musician Bud Scott.
Built 1910-25.
Private Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: music (jazz) No visitor services Scott is often listed as a New Orleans jazz musician, since he performed frequently in New Orleans.
460 Mostly African Market Mississippi Adams County, Natchez Art gallery housed in Emile Angelety House (ca. 1850) features works of local black artists and writers; also has gift shop selling west African arts and crafts Private market in public building Cultural Diversity; Expressing Cultural Values: arts and crafts; Natchez Museum of African-American History and Culture Open Wed.-Sat. 1-5 p.m.
No structured interpretation.
Winter exhibits feature artwork of loca
